From my point of view, the literature curriculum was formed by middle-aged ladies based on their interests.
From Russian literature of the 19th century, we preferred Danilevsky and Volkonsky.
They wrote fiction, of course, from the point of view of those very ladies of a certain age.
As for the psychology and suffering of Tolstoy's and Turgenev's heroines, they are not so interesting to teenagers.
Teenagers are rarely interested in the psychology of heroes.
Many thanks, very interesting.
Perhaps the roses were made of plush to represent a particular variety of them?
There are roses of this color and with this petal structure that resemble velvet, usually dark red or burgundy in color.
And light-colored roses look different, the petals have an actual satin or silk sheen.
Sharks are attacking surfers, mistaking them for sea turtles...
Bulls seem to be colour-blind.
Bears eat carrion...
Gorillas MUST NOT look you in the eye - in some safari parks visitors are given glasses with eyes drawn on them looking away.
Bees are still guided by smell...
The Promtex Micropacket Prestige 105х195 mattress.
The “Micropack Prestige” model: comfort and natural composition.
The mattress has different levels of firmness on each side: the medium-firm surface is made of latex-coated coconut fiber and natural latex, and the moderately soft side is made of a natural latex plate.
The 1000-spring-per-square-metre spring block quickly adapts to the sleeper's body, preventing the "wave" or "hammock" effect.
Among the advantages of the model, it is worth noting the breathable materials.
Latex, perforated for breathability, naturally ventilates as well as coconut coir.
This maintains a healthy microclimate in the sleeping area.
The mattress is also covered by an extended warranty period.
The official warranty period from the manufacturer is 5 years, but in fact, the lifespan of the mattress is longer.
Dust and dirt protection is provided by a removable jacquard cover that is included.
Pair your mattress with an orthopedic pillow - it is recommended to support the optimal position of the spine during sleep.
The filling determines the purpose of the sides - the coconut serves as an anatomical support for the back, the latex relaxes the muscles.
Use your brain and get rid of such relatives!
It's better not to have any at all than ones like these...
Either find a third-party driver or someone who is willing to invest and work with you as a partner.
If it doesn’t work out, then sell the car, even at a loss, don’t be stingy.
Next time, think better...
Andrei, you have been clearly explained that pensioners work in schools, they will not work in the command line.
The computer science teacher won’t be able to help either, he wasn’t taught this, the schoolkids are playing games in Windows.
So there is no support.
I remember with horror these banquets and the guests at my parents' home.
The guests are at the door, and the cutlets are still being fried on the stove, and the mother is shampooing the floor.
Lord, I was already exhausted by the time I sat down at the table.
And then wash the dishes, clean the house.
For a week before the holiday, you drag groceries, two days of cooking, and a day of cleaning afterwards.
And what about the guests?
They are well, and they always bring a cake with them.
Ever since then, I don’t like holidays or guests.
Even for my family, I set the table for the bare minimum.
As for the treats, I make them for them, I bake very often just for the sake of it.
Germany: A fourth coronavirus vaccination is inevitable
A fourth vaccination will be required in the summer or autumn of 2022.
In the opinion of the expert, the current vaccination in Germany will not be the final one, but will continue with renewed vigour.
Despite an active vaccination campaign in Germany, neither two nor three doses of the coronavirus vaccine will probably be enough for full protection.
This is the belief of the head of the Association of General Practitioners, Ulrich Weigel.
Die Welt reported this on Saturday, 11 December.
"We expect that the fourth vaccination will be required in the summer, at the latest in the fall," the expert believes.
In addition, Waigel hopes that the fourth coronavirus vaccination can be carried out "in combination with the flu vaccine."
This will help achieve the best results.
In addition, booster vaccination can help in the fight against the spread of the new Omicron strain of the coronavirus.
Moreover, the new variant is especially dangerous.
For example, the probability of reinfection with Omicron is three times higher than with the Delta or Beta strains.
This is indicated by the results of a preliminary study conducted in South Africa.
Based on this, the BioNTech/Pfizer manufacturers are planning to provide a vaccine adapted to Omikron by March 2022.
The companies emphasize that two doses of the vaccine do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the new Omicron variant of the coronavirus.
The BioNTech-Pfizer study showed that effectiveness was significantly lower with two doses of the vaccine: "neutralizing potential was reduced by more than 25 times."
"This suggests that two doses of BNT162b2 do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the omicron variant," said BioNTech and Pfizer.
This is why a third dose is needed.
Experts insist on accelerating the pace of vaccinations in the country.
For example, the head of the German Society for Infectious Diseases, Bernd Salzberger, is in favour of shortening the interval between the second and third vaccination.
Moreover, according to Salzberger, accelerated vaccination will affect the spread of both the delta virus and the omicron variant of the coronavirus.
“Israel’s experience shows this very convincingly”, the expert emphasized.
Pontoon21 wobbler, Bet-A Vib, 54 Silent, 54 mm, 8.5 g.
The Bet-A-Vib series is a special branch of the Bet-A family from Pontoon21®.
It (like the Kalikana Vib series) is different from many other vibes in that it was originally designed with ice fishing in mind, not just casting.
These wobblers have a greater specific weight than their close-sized counterparts, which, without a doubt, has a positive effect on the nuances of using these interesting lures.
Another distinctive feature is the top fin, made of a strong and flexible plastic, which creates additional vibrations when the lure is retrieved both vertically and horizontally.
When fished vertically, the Bet-A-Vib shows a fairly aggressive action as a "winter wobbler."
Often the most effective is simple monotonous animation, that is, moving the lure up and down almost without pauses.
When planning, the deviation from the vertical axis is not very great, which is convenient when fishing in a limited space that is cluttered with underwater plants, snags and other obstacles that could result in a snag.
In addition, a slight deviation is relevant when fishing for pike and large perch in winter, and especially in the middle of winter, when it is necessary to make a targeted and aggressive presentation of the lure.
Reaching the end of its trajectory, Bet-A-Vib instantly reverses direction and returns to its original vertical position.
Bet-A-Vib is just as effective for winter fishing for pond trout.
To meet her whims, you can choose from two modifications: with a sound capsule (NS – NanoSound) or without it (SL – Silent).
It is also noted that the Bet-A-Vib is capable of irritating a passive pike that does not even react to live bait.
When casting, the Bet-A-Vib demonstrates distance and accuracy.
This wobbler is easy to understand and not temperamental, it goes well with both monofilament and braided lines of even large diameters.
In order to catch pike, pikeperch, roach or perch, in addition to a uniform retrieve, a "step" is also effective, sometimes with "chattering" on the bottom.
If you're fishing in snaggy areas, you can change the front treble hook to a double hook, which will reduce the chances of snags.
In its class the Bet-A-Vib is one of the most durable and as a result one of the most productive.
It can be used equally successfully in both relatively shallow and fairly deep areas.
All models come equipped with Owner ST-36 hooks.
How many young layabouts are sitting on the neck of their elderly parents.
The "golden youth" are obviously lazy people in the majority, who can't do anything and don't know anything.
A well-fed life is conducive to idleness.
Perhaps Mishustin had this large part of the population in mind.
Surely you're joking.
I have never seen a pair of shoes in this store that I wanted to buy.
What are you writing about long-term wear?
This footwear is made of fake leather.
It will be good if it can last for one season.
Zenden is at the same level as Kuyt.
I went in a couple of times, had a look and understood that there was nothing to do there.
7,000 Russian mercenaries have been reported in Libya
More than 7,000 mercenaries from the private military company (PMC) “Wagner” are in Libya.
The head of the republic's Supreme State Council, Khaled al-Mishri, announced this on Sunday, December 12.
"Currently there are more than 7,000 Wagner PMC mercenaries in Libya.
They also have airplanes.
They are also digging trenches in Sirte and Kufra.
They have 30 fighter jets at the Ghardabiya airbase (which is also used as a civilian airport in Sirte)," Anadolu quotes him as saying.
Khaled al-Mishri also pointed out that the Russian mercenaries are "trying to seize" the central part of Libya, stretching from Chad to the Mediterranean, after "bringing their man to power" in the Central African Republic.
Remain present
According to the publication's source, Moscow was looking for a country to preserve its presence in North Africa and "settled on Libya".
"Wagner" has been in Libya since 2019, uses the airbase and port in Sirte, as well as the airbase in Jufra, the agency notes.
Russian authorities have officially denied that the Wagner PMC receives support from the Kremlin.
Where else could the mercenaries be?
According to the agency, "Wagner" is allegedly active in nine African countries - the Central African Republic, Libya, Sudan, Mozambique, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Madagascar, Zimbabwe and Angola.
The company provides military training for local forces, personal protection for leaders, and protection of energy facilities.
In exchange for these services, Wagner’s subsidiaries receive certain privileges and licenses for the use of mineral resources and natural resources, as well as for the supply of weapons, technology and military services to these countries," the article states.
As reported by the media, the “Wagnerites” allegedly fought in Donbass, Syria, Mozambique, Sudan, and the Central African Republic.
This group is not listed in the security services or in the register of legal entities, and its fighters are not listed in the official rosters of personnel.
This company is under US sanctions.
Recall that earlier, the permanent representatives of 27 EU countries approved restrictions against "Wagner".
It is expected that the Council of the European Union will approve this decision on December 13.
The situation in Libya
The High State Council of Libya is, in fact, the second chamber of parliament with advisory functions, dominated by Islamists, writes TASS.
This body has repeatedly called for the postponement of the single voting day for the election of parliamentarians and the head of state from 24 December at least until February 2022.
"Less than two weeks remain until the election, and the chances of it taking place on time are rapidly decreasing," the article notes.
Against this background, the Libyan High Election Commission has postponed the announcement of the final list of candidates indefinitely, Sky News Arabia reports.
Foreign policy through the eyes of Russians
38% of Russians see more successes than failures in the country’s foreign policy, while 29% believe that failures predominate.
"Examples of successes are: "we protected and restored peace in Syria", "the decision on Nord Stream 2", "we scared the whole world that we have powerful weapons", "we took back Crimea".
The main failures are ‘conflict with Ukraine’, ‘confrontation with western countries’, and ‘isolation from the world’, the study by the Public Opinion Foundation says.
The Dubai government has completely abandoned paper-based record-keeping - all government services have also become digital-only
The government of Dubai has announced a complete switch from paper-based administration to digital technology.
All government services to the public will also be provided exclusively in electronic form.
This is reported by the Emirati news agency WAM.
"Today marks the beginning of a new phase of digitizing all aspects of life in Dubai - we have completed the transition to a fully paperless government," Dubai's Crown Prince and Chairman of the Executive Council of Dubai, Sheikh Hamdan bin Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, said on Saturday.
Now, the internal and external document flow in all Dubai government institutions will be carried out only in digital form through special information platforms.
This innovation affected all sectors without exception: healthcare, utilities, the police, municipal authorities, courts, and so on. Many commercial structures also joined the government’s initiative.
The transition to electronic government and digitization of document flow began in Dubai in 2018.
During this time, according to the authorities, 336 million pieces of paper were saved, which is equivalent to 14 million hours of human labor and $353.8 million in monetary terms.
Earlier, the mayor of Moscow, Sergei Sobyanin, said that electronic services save citizens two days a year.
Dana, well, about dates of birth and how old the child is, this is already dementia, about the class and group in kindergarten too.
Well, I just don't believe that people like that exist.
And if they do, they obviously don't care about anything, including their family.
My mother, her two brothers, and her grandfather and grandmother lived at 3 Vladimirskaya, on the first floor without bars.
First they knocked on the door, then on the window, then they decided not to be polite, broke the window and climbed in, but the grandfather had a baseball bat with which they received.
These people knew for sure that there was someone in the house...
Turkey's car production, exports fall below 2020 level
Turkey's car production and exports fell sharply in November amid the lira's devaluation.
As a result, the industry's figures for the first 11 months were worse than last year's results, reports Bloomberg, citing data from the Turkish Automotive Manufacturers' Association.
According to the association, 115,000 cars were released from factories in Turkey in November, which is 20% less than a year earlier.
Some 75,900 cars were exported, which is more than 25% less than last year’s figure.
And if, according to the results of the first 10 months of this year, the automotive sector of Turkey demonstrated positive dynamics compared to last year, then according to the results of 11 months of 2021, car production was already 0.3% worse than last year's figure.
The reason for such a decline was the sharp depreciation of the Turkish lira, which fell by 29% against the dollar in November.
This led to a decline in economic activity across all sectors.
More than 500 micro, small and medium-sized businesses received a credit payment deferral in 2021
First Deputy Prime Minister Alikhan Smailov spoke about the situation regarding the provision of benefits for small and medium-sized businesses, reports a correspondent for the Kazinform news agency.
“According to information from the Republic of Kazakhstan Agency for Regulation and Development of the Financial Market, this year, in implementation of the instruction of the Head of State of 1 April 2021, the Chairman of the Agency issued Order No. 127 of 9 April 2021 “On the Approval of the Procedure for Granting Payment Deferrals for Loans to Subjects of Small and Medium Businesses”, wrote Alikhan Smailov in his response to the deputy’s request.
He recalled that the procedure for granting payment deferrals on loans provided for banks and organizations engaged in microfinance to grant payment deferrals on loans issued to SMEs, including sole proprietors, from 1 April to 30 June 2021.
The deferment period was from 30 to 90 days at the discretion of the SME.
The borrower’s statement may have indicated a different payment deferral period.
During the deferral period for the borrower, the creditor suspended debt collection, notice of the need to repay the overdue debt, and collection of fees and other payments from the borrower," noted the deputy prime minister.
In 2021, second-tier banks received requests for loan payment deferrals from 603 SME borrowers, of which 553 SME borrowers received a deferral for a total of 9.7 billion tenge.
131 SMEs applied to the MFIs for deferment, of which 95 SMEs were granted deferment in the amount of 105.8 million tenge," concluded A. Smailov.
The pulmonologist Puryasev suggested that people with a weak immune system are able to easily tolerate the "omicron" strain
A doctor suggested that people with weakened immune systems may be able to tolerate it better than those with a strong immune response
The pulmonologist Sergey Puryasev explained why the omicron strain of the coronavirus could be dangerous.
The reason lies in the conditions in which the virus originated.
Scientists believe that "okmiron" was born in the body of an HIV-infected or immune-deficient person.
That is, when it mutates, it does not encounter any resistance from the immune system.
As a result, it is more aggressive.
Because there was no response from the immune system, it became very quick.
Apparently, there are more of these spike proteins, which are like thorns, than there should be, and their antibodies were not reduced during mutations, says pulmonologist Sergey Puryasev.
The doctor suggested that people with a weakened immune system may tolerate "ocmiron" better than those with a strong immune response.
It turns out that a strong immune response to anything, to any infection, is not always a good thing.
In such cases, the body can kill itself.
This is how it is with pneumococcal infections, when 30-year-old young people die, and 60-year-old old people cough it off.
The immune response is crazy in young people, it’s completely out of control: there, where you could only wave your finger, it’s like firing a cannon at a sparrow, Sergei Puryasev concluded.
The doctor also reminded that the coronavirus has dangerous side effects and the worst of them is pneumonia.
Pneumonia can be bacterial or viral.
If the first can be treated very successfully and quickly, in the second case it is often only possible to alleviate the symptoms - all hope is on the body.
The first sign of developing pneumonia will be the beginning of intoxication of the body - this is a temperature, weakness, and feeling unwell.
Then there are the respiratory symptoms: shortness of breath, a tickle in the throat, a cough.
Pain on the right or left side, or abdominal pain, can also indicate a developing problem.
Meanwhile, in Russia, they may start vaccinating the younger generation from 12 to 18 years old by the end of the year.
Virologist, head of the genome engineering laboratory at MIPT Pavel Volchkov noted that this category is very actively suffering from COVID-19.
For children who go to school, the number of contacts is at its maximum.
This is the most socially active segment, just like the children in kindergartens - said Pavel Volchkov, a virologist and the head of the Laboratory of Genome Engineering at the Moscow Institute of Physics and Technology, to Moscow 24.
A huge thank you to the author for this article.
I was happy to refresh my memory...
Teath-In.
Back in the 1970s and 1980s, no dance floor was complete without the melodies of this group.
And at home, when we got together with friends, we would dance to their music.
Immunologists have suggested a hypothesis as to why people with obesity become victims of COVID-19
The authors studied the fatty tissue left over from bariatric operations and found that fat cells, known as adipocytes, can become infected with the coronavirus.
The immune cells located in the fatty tissue, macrophages, were also infected, and showed a strong inflammatory response.
The scientists also looked at the fat tissue of patients who died from COVID-19 and found particles of the coronavirus in the fat surrounding various organs.
It is known that HIV and flu viruses can hide in fatty tissue, using it as a reservoir, in attempts to evade the immune system.
It is possible that SARS-CoV-2 is capable of this as well.
A biologist spoke about the reasons for the appearance of dementia
Candidate of biological sciences, Semyon Golosheykin, named the causes of the appearance of dementia and spoke about ways to prevent it in an interview with the Sputnik radio station.
According to WHO, more than 55 million people are affected by this disease.
The syndrome is manifested by a gradual loss of cognitive functions - over time, a person with the syndrome finds it difficult to orient even in a familiar environment.
Golosheikin noted that the most common causes of dementia are neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
Some factors increase the risk of developing the disease.
This includes hypertension, diabetes, high cholesterol, obesity, depression, and alcoholism.
Behaviourally, factors such as social isolation and lack of active cognitive engagement may play a role," he said.
The development of dementia is also affected by bad habits - smoking, alcohol abuse, sleep disorders, and a sedentary lifestyle.
Among the first signs, the expert noted forgetfulness, inability to concentrate, and a decrease in the level of abstract thinking.
"There is debate as to whether hearing loss could be an early sign of Alzheimer's or a risk factor for it," the biologist added.
To prevent the onset of the disease, the World Health Organization (WHO) recommends maintaining an adequate level of physical activity, exercising cognitive skills and abilities that require the involvement of memory and logic.
Previously, the professor of the department of neurology, neurosurgery and medical genetics of the Federal State Budgetary Educational Institution of Higher Education Russian National Research Medical University named after N.I.
N.I. Pirogov, head of the Department of Cognitive Disorders at the Federal Center of the Brain and Neurotechnologies, Anna Bogolepova, spoke about the causes of memory problems.
Egypt has returned about 30,000 artifacts illegally smuggled out of the country
Over the past 10 years, the Cairo government has managed to return about 30,000 artifacts illegally smuggled out of the country.
This was reported on Saturday, 11 December, in the Al-Hayat channel broadcast by the chief inspector of the Department of Returned Antiquities of the Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt, Shaaban Abdel Gawad.
Since 2011, the Egyptian state has managed to recover 29,300 artifacts.
Just this year, the Museum of the Bible in Washington found 5,300 artifacts from ancient Egyptian civilization," he said.
Abdel Gawad clarified that all the smuggled artifacts are registered in the archives.
Currently, department employees are working on their return to Egypt.
In particular, experts “are monitoring auctions around the world and online sales” through foreign and Egyptian websites, as well as social networks.
The chief inspector said that once returned, the cultural treasures are restored, and then displayed in museums.
He said one of the returned artifacts was an ancient human skeleton found in Belgium, which is now part of the collection of the National Museum of Egyptian Civilization in Cairo.
In 2020, the Egyptian authorities turned to Interpol with a request to help find the pharaoh Tutankhamun’s bust sold at an auction in London.
On July 4, the Christie’s auction house held an auction in which the 3,000-year-old bust was sold for $5.97 million (about 680 million roubles).
This caused discontent from Egypt.
The Egyptian side also says the artwork was illegally taken out of the Karnak temple in Luxor in the 1970s.
Tutankhamun's head, depicted as the sun god Amun, had been in a private collection and had not been offered for sale since 1985.
It is unknown how the relic came to Europe.
In recent years, Egypt has been actively pursuing the repatriation of antiquities illegally smuggled out of the country at different times.
According to the authorities, 95% of smuggled antiquities is the result of archaeological excavations by "black diggers".
"The Crimean Tatars are not taken into account" - and this is correct, because the Crimean Tatars (232,000) are an independent people (close to the Turks).
If you want to add, then only 42 thousand people - that's how many Kazan Tatars live in Crimea (see the census).
Crimean Tatars are a separate people, and the name of this people consists of two words!
They are only united by the Turkic language group.
FT: Credit Suisse wants access to staff's personal mobile devices
Credit Suisse is requiring its staff to give the bank access to their personal mobile devices, the Financial Times reports.
The fact is that in Europe and the United States, the Swiss bank does not issue its employees corporate communications devices, instead offering a discount on the purchase of a mobile phone or smartphone from a partner - a telecommunications operator.
Under current rules, a bank can monitor information on corporate devices issued to its employees because they are used to conduct business with colleagues or clients.
The bank has the right to inspect mobile devices in extreme cases - for example, if an employee used it to hold a meeting with a client that was not approved by Credit Suisse.
Now, with many staff working from home, the bank wants to apply the rule to all devices used for work purposes.
According to the newspaper, the bank's management has set a deadline by which employees must familiarize themselves with the new rule.
Credit Suisse has not officially commented on the new requirement.
The Sontelle Vivre Dual royal 70x200 mattress.
In the center of the Vivre Dual royal mattress is a high-quality and durable TFK 18 block of independent springs.
The natural coconut layers add rigidity, the zoned latex distributes the load more evenly, the latex with Aloe ensures the hygiene of the sleeping place, and the relief foam relaxes.
A medium-firm, symmetrical mattress with a height of 30 cm.
The product is supplied packaged in a tight roll and is ready for use in a short time after unpacking.
The cover is made from a strong knitted fabric with stitching on a comfortable layer.
The fabric of the case does not crease and does not stretch over time.
Part 4
Sergei Yesenin’s last year of life - 1925 - was fruitful in terms of creativity, but the most difficult for the poet’s earthly existence and his “ego”.
He is already beyond any literary associations, he spat out imagism, he is on his own, but he is known, in demand, sometimes strongly criticized by critics, even spitefully, but the reading public is ready to carry him on their shoulders.
More than 60 poems were written over the year, many of them real masterpieces, the "Persian Motifs" cycle was completed, the poem "Anna Snegina" was written, and 8 books were published, including the collection "Soviet Russia".
And the main success was at the end of June 1925, when the State Publishing House concluded a contract with Esenin for the publication of his works in three volumes.
None of Sergei Alexandrovich's contemporary poets have been honored in this way, he is the first!
In addition, it promised very good money – according to the contract, the honorarium was 1000 roubles per month for 20 months (the director of the plant, for example, received 300 roubles per month, and the engineer – 200).
Funds were needed more than ever that year.
Yesenin married the granddaughter of Leo Tolstoy, Sofia Tolstoy, he needed to set up family life, support his sisters, Katya and Sasha, and his mother.
It seemed that life was getting back on track, there was something to be happy about, but for him everything was mainly in dark tones, as if the nightmare from the poem "The Black Man" (written in November 1925 and published after his death) had materialized:
My friend, my friend,
I'm very, very ill.
I don't know where this pain came from.
Either the wind is whistling
Over an empty and deserted field,
Is it like a forest in September,
Alcohol is a brain-fogger.
Many acquaintances noted that Yessenin had lost a lot of weight, looked bad, and was clearly ill.
More and more, there are outbursts and nervous breakdowns.
And the reason is probably not just alcoholism...
However, if such a diagnosis - alcoholism - was made to Sergei Alexandrovich by someone, there are no reliable documents left.
For example, relating to May 1923, when Yesenin, at the insistence of his fourth wife, the American Isadora Duncan, was recovering his health in a clinic near Paris under Professor Pyotr Gannushkin (Yesenin will return to him two years later, already in Moscow).
But there are plenty of testimonies of the poet’s binges, scandals on this subject, and visits to the police – they’re scattered across dozens of memoirs.
From the early 1920s, the poet's terrible romance with the green snake developed at a rapid pace.
At the end of the summer of 1923, Yesenin stayed for a short time with a friend, the imagist Ivan Starcev.
It's surprising, but Yessenin, with his very decent income, never had his own home either in Moscow or in Saint Petersburg; he lived in rented apartments, in hotels, or with acquaintances.
Starcev recalls:
"He would only come to sleep and, in most cases, in an irrational, drunken state.
Once, returning at four in the morning, Yesenin fell on the landing...
Falling, I scratched my face and wheezed.
When he came to, he began to cough continuously, spraying blood all over the sheet..."
Even Esenin himself admitted this after his trip to Europe and the United States (there was a dry law in the United States at the time, but Duncan took a good supply of alcohol with her):
"All I saw there were pigs and streets...
By the end, I stopped remembering people...
Well, and he drank, of course...
But I drank because I was overcome by melancholy."
Pirelli (Pirelli) Scorpion Winter 265/45 R20 108V
The Pirelli Scorpion Winter winter tire, based on a high-strength mixture of rubber and silica, ensures long-term effective operation, even wear, and resistance to loads.
The linear tread pattern of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tire, which forms the ribs, guarantees low rolling resistance and directional stability.
Four deep grooves effectively remove water, mud from the contact patch of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tire, suppress skidding and aquaplaning.
The 3D scalloped design increases traction on slippery roads, snow, and ice.
The large shoulder blocks of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter enhance the tyre’s lateral grip when cornering, increase traction and reduce braking distance.
Small grooves and notches conduct heat away.
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom 100x195 mattress
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom is a modern version of a budget model in the premium class line.
The foundation of the mattress is the Duet block of independent double springs.
Inside the large spring is a smaller, softer spring.
This allows the load on the mattress to be evenly distributed.
Both sides of the mattress are filled with a filler - artificial latex.
It is a substitute for natural latex, but it is thicker and less expensive.
The flexibility and elasticity of this material increases the comfort effect of the mattress.
Synthetic latex is hypoallergenic, it does not absorb moisture or dust.
The mattress is ideal for a couple with a large difference in weight (up to 30 kilograms).
Thanks to the "smart" springs, there is no wave effect here, when a light partner slides to the side of a heavy one.
The pleasant, soft-to-the-touch Sense jacquard cover is lined with a layer of synthetic padding.
Natural fabrics do not hold static electricity.
It is possible that this model of mattress is made in a rolled-up version (vacuum roll-packing).
Now my son is almost 16, and his desire to misbehave has long been gone.
All the energy is focused on choosing what he will do for a living.
He's a lot more responsible than I was at his age or my husband, who had periodic run-ins with the law up until our wedding.
A father cares for his young daughter.
And it loves, as Lermontov wrote, "with a strange love".
Why did the girl cry during the exam when she hadn't even failed it yet?
Why didn't he tell his daughter that it wasn't school?
Well, it will have a tail.
So what?
It will be resubmitted.
This is known to millions of students.
What is it all about anyway?
Poland's foreign ministry says Belarus is using migrants as 'weapon' against EU
Poland's foreign ministry says Belarus is using migrants as 'weapon'
Deputy Minister of Foreign Affairs of Poland, Paweł Jabłoński, expressed the opinion that the President of Belarus, Alexander Lukashenko, used refugees as “weapons” against the European Union, and intends to return to such an “operation” next year.
The deputy head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs made the relevant statement in an interview with the Australian Financial Review newspaper.
According to Yablonsky, the sanctions against Belarus have “temporarily stopped Lukashenko”, but he is “actively looking for new ways”.
Also, the Polish official is confident that now illegal migrants will be used as a weapon "in many parts of the world".
As the kp.ru website wrote, earlier, the European Union implemented the fifth package of sanctions against Belarus.
It targeted 17 individuals and 11 organizations.
Europe has stated its readiness to expand restrictive measures against the republic ‘if the situation in the country does not improve’.
In response, Minsk imposed a food embargo on a wide range of goods from countries that had previously decided to impose sanctions against Belarus.
Clothing cover 60×100 cm, spunbond, blue.
In order for your clothes to serve you for a long time, you need to take care of them properly.
Proper storage will prolong its life and keep it looking good.
To help us with this, we have a garment bag!
Benefits.
By using a garment bag, you save a lot of space.
This is especially true if you have a lot of things and a small closet.
Neat appearance.
No more dresses, sweaters and skirts hanging out of place.
The neat covers allow clothes to be sorted and hidden from prying eyes.
For those who use a standing desk instead of a regular desk, this is the best option.
A cover protects clothing from dust and dirt, insects, mechanical damage, or possible fading.
Prevents clothing from changing shape during long-term storage, prevents the formation of creases.
Features of clothing covers.
The special material will allow your clothes to “breathe”.
With proper care, the shelf life of such a cover is not limited.
In them, you can store not only clothes, but also bedding, pillows, and bedding.
The case is "sealed" using a strong zip.
It's important to remember!
Pre-treat items for long-term storage: clean them, iron them.
Choose a case that's the right size: your items shouldn't be folded over at the bottom.
It is not recommended to hang several bulky things in one case: they may become wrinkled.
If you value order and tidiness, cherish your things, want to preserve them and extend their service life, order a clothing cover.
Visit the large catalogue and choose the item in the colour and size you need at a great price!
"Not a hat for Senya": when a velvet jacket makes a man a laughingstock
Velvet blazers dominated the social scene in 2021.
Perhaps the first to announce his new fashion choice was Daniel Craig.
As early as September, at the premiere of the film "No Time to Die", he appeared in a velvet mauve jacket and the traditional "Bond" bow tie.
Prince William followed in his footsteps twice, first wearing a green velvet jacket that didn't fit the royal dress code to the Earthshot Prize awards ceremony, and then choosing a more classic look for an event in support of the Royal Variety Charity.
A couple of weeks ago, the trend was picked up by Lionel Messi.
The football player came to pick up his seventh "Golden Ball" in a velvet Dolce & Gabbana jacket.
By the way, his sons were dressed the same.
AliExpress has already noted a growing demand for velvet men's jackets in Russia.
According to data from the service’s analysts received by Gazeta.Ru, they are being bought 1.4 times more often.
The most popular are the warm velvet jackets with a lining and a fitted silhouette, the main colours are dark beige, burgundy, dark blue and, of course, black.
The average price of such models is from 3,000 to 6,000 rubles. At the same time, men prefer to buy only jackets - they choose sets of velvet suits less often.
You can buy them not only from online retailers.
Budget options are available at H&M, Mango, Next and Zara.
In the luxury segment, velvet jackets are represented in almost all brands this season - from Brioni to Paul Smith, from Etro to Saint Laurent.
The most desirable is considered to be the Gucci model, in which the brand's ambassador, Jared Leto, appeared at one of the premieres of the film "House of Gucci".
When choosing jackets from expensive brands, you can be sure that the velvet is made from silk.
Thanks to a special method of interweaving the threads, a dense fabric with a fluffy outer texture and a smooth inner side is obtained.
More budget-friendly options are made from cotton or polyamide, but they also last less.
The Lamoda fashion expert Ilya Vakhoshkin warns that in the case of a velvet jacket, the most important thing is not its model or style, but appropriateness.
"Velvet requires evening light, so such a jacket is ideal if you're going to a party or a formal event," explains Vahoshkin. "It will also be suitable for those occasions when the invitation specifies a "Black Tie" or "Creative Black Tie" dress code.
Another important criterion that allows you to make a choice in favour of a velvet jacket is the status of its buyer.
"A man in a velvet jacket, first and foremost, should acquire the right advanced crowd with enough money," the authors of the Telegram channel on men's fashion "Handsome Brummell" believe. "Owners of velvet jackets, as a rule, belong to the caste of those people who rarely buy tickets.
They are simply invited to social events, which always specify a dress code.
Ilya Vakhoskin suggests combining a velvet jacket with other smart items: classic trousers with turn-ups, plain shirts, silk ties, tasselled loafers, and cufflinks.
Too simple and ordinary things will look out of place.
The fashion experts from "Beau Brummell" are sure that it would be inappropriate for an ordinary employee to appear in a velvet jacket at a corporate event, but if we are talking about "a manager from among those who are in charge of this event, then "yes", he would suit such a thing".
If a lower-ranked employee has the goal of moving up in the company’s complex hierarchy or getting financial bonuses, it is better not to wear a velvet jacket.
The management will certainly appreciate the phrase “not a cap for Sanya”, say the editors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion.
I have mixed feelings about the voice.
This is an unnatural timbre; it's so strained.
And it has absolutely nothing to do with the sweet face of a young girl.
To be honest, I don’t understand the admiration of those around me.
But from the bottom of my heart, I wish you good luck in life!
It all comes down to money: alternative energy is well-lobbied, i.e. paid for.
Billion-dollar investments.
Are they sad?
No, the price of electricity has gone up.
Traditional energy is also not out of the question - gas, oil, and coal were all bought cheaper than they are being sold now.
There's wild demand for fuel.
A penny drips.
And who is in the flight then?
As usual, I was just a regular customer.
Do the problems of the Indians touch the sheriff?
Therefore, Western politicians should not be considered idiots for “sleeping through” the energy crisis.
They did their job.
For a not-bad bribe.
I didn't see any beautiful people in the photos in the article.
It's just mediocrity in the context of the average passenger.
Perhaps, if such characters are so sure of their beauty that they decide to show it to the whole carriage, then no one will sit next to them, most likely.
But only because of the mental illness and ignorance of such "beauties", but certainly not because of their appearance.
Kazbek, "a slave conscious of his slave status and fighting against it, is a revolutionary.
The slave who does not realize his slavery and wallows in the silent, unconscious, and wordless life of a slave is simply a slave.
A slave who drools when he self-righteously describes the joys of a slave life and extols the virtues of a good and kind master is a lackey, a sycophant."
The immunologist stated that revaccination in 4-5 months will help to protect against the "omicron" coronavirus strain
A revaccination four to five months later can protect against the new strain of the coronavirus infection "omicron".
This statement was made by immunologist Nikolai Kryuchkov, who called the vaccination after six months, taking into account the appearance of a new strain, "a very long period"
"With the previous strains, such a period was normal, but now it is best to conduct the procedure after five months, and for people with chronic conditions - after four," the expert said, calling for revaccination to be carried out in parallel with the vaccination campaign.
Kruchkov also noted that early revaccination provides a good titer of neutralizing antibodies.
"If a person has had two jabs and a booster, or has recovered and been vaccinated, or has been vaccinated and recovered, then he has "hybrid immunity", that is, he has a lot of antibodies and enough neutralising ones", the expert clarified.
G7 warns Russia of 'massive consequences' if it invades Ukraine
The G7 countries (Britain, Germany, Italy, Canada, the United States, France and Japan) have published a statement following a meeting of foreign ministers in Liverpool.
It stresses that "military aggression" by Russia against Ukraine "will have enormous consequences and will be very expensive" for Moscow, but specific measures are not described in the document.
"We, the foreign ministers of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States and the High Representative of the European Union, are united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine," the statement said.
Next, the ministers call on Russia to “de-escalate, use diplomatic channels, and abide by its international commitments on military transparency,” as U.S. President Biden said during a video call with Russian President Putin on 7 December.
“We confirm our support for the efforts of France and Germany in the Normandy format to achieve the full implementation of the Minsk agreements with a view to resolving the conflict in eastern Ukraine”, the foreign ministers of the G7 also state.
Any use of force to change borders is strictly prohibited by international law.
Russia should have no doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have massive consequences and severe costs," they warned.
We reaffirm our unwavering commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Ukraine, and the right of any sovereign state to determine its own future.
We welcome the restrained position of Ukraine.
We will intensify our cooperation on our common, comprehensive response," the statement also said.
Earlier in the day, the head of British diplomacy, Elizabeth Truss, said that Russia would face "serious consequences" in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
According to her, this meeting showed the "united voice of the G7 countries, which account for 50% of the world's GDP, and which made it very clear that the invasion of Ukraine will have huge consequences for Russia".
Pfizer vaccine found to be 32 times less effective against Omicron variant
The effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the Omicron strain of the coronavirus is 32 times lower compared to other types of the disease.
This conclusion was reached by scientists from the University of Hong Kong and the Chinese University of Hong Kong, reports South China Morning Post (SCMP).
The vaccine was deemed less effective based on a study of the antiviral activity of citizens who received two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine.
"We see that most people had a high level of antiviral activity against the original Sars-CoV-2 variant, but this ability was greatly reduced against the omicron variant," Professor Malik Peiris said.
At the same time, the scientists emphasized that vaccination remains the most reliable way to protect against a severe course of the disease when infected with the coronavirus.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted the development of the coronavirus pandemic taking into account the impact of the omicron strain.
The authors of the study concluded that the omicron variant could cause a new wave of virus circulation and an increase in mortality if additional measures are not taken.
The head of the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense accused Germany of blocking the delivery of NATO weapons to Kiev
The head of the Ministry of Defense of Ukraine, Aleksey Reznikov, accused the government of former German Chancellor Angela Merkel of blocking Kyiv’s acquisition of lethal weapons within NATO.
In an interview with the Financial Times on December 12, Reznikov reminded that last month, Germany vetoed the purchase by Ukraine of anti-sniper systems and rifles for shooting down drones.
At the same time, it is noted that later, Berlin softened its position on rifles, recognizing them as non-lethal weapons.
According to the Minister of Defense, Kiev intends to acquire the above-mentioned weapons as part of bilateral agreements with allies.
In particular, this refers to the United States, the United Kingdom, Lithuania, and France.
Meanwhile, the FT notes that the position of the new German government led by Chancellor Olaf Scholz on the issue of the supply of weapons to Ukraine remains unclear.
Earlier on Sunday, the Ambassador of Ukraine to Germany, Andriy Melnyk, expressed the opinion that Kyiv should not expect arms deliveries from Berlin under Chancellor Scholz.
According to him, the previous German government explained its refusal to provide weapons with the risk of developing a military escalation of the conflict in Donbass, despite the "occupation of Russia" of part of Ukrainian territory.
The diplomat is sure that Germany will maintain the same “illogical” position with the new chancellor.
In August, Ukrainian leader Volodymyr Zelensky said that Kiev was expecting assistance from Berlin in equipping the naval fleet.
Ukraine hopes that Germany “will be Ukraine’s partner in a technical sense”, added the president.
It was also noted that in the spring of this year, the co-chair of the German Green Party, Robert Habeck, visited the republic, where he advocated the sale of defensive weapons to Kyiv.
Sergey NOSOV 2, no, bad eyesight has nothing to do with it.
To type "I" instead of "E"?
Allowing a lot of commas?
And write instead of write.
No, you are an illiterate person.
And this is a disgrace for a philologist.
Fishing game set: e/f light, sound, includes game board, 2 fishing rods, 5 figures, 3AA batteries not included, cor.
The electric kid's fishing pole is a fun and developmentally beneficial toy for a child.
While playing, the child will train their fine motor skills of their hands, develop their dexterity, accuracy and attention.
When you switch on the toy, 5 tiny fish will start swimming around a simulated pond to a cheerful tune.
The child's task is to catch them all on the hook!
You can play on your own or with a friend: the set includes 2 fishing rods.
The toy is powered by 3 x 1.5V AA batteries (not included).
The size of the playing field (LxWxH) is 21x17x4 cm.
The item is made of plastic.
Recommended age: 3 years +
The winners of the Arsenyev Prize have been named in Moscow - Rossiyskaya Gazeta
The solemn award ceremony for the winners of the third season of the All-Russian Literary Prize “Far East” named after
V. K. Arsenyev passed in Moscow.
As reported on the award’s Instagram page, a total of 89 applications were submitted to the organizing committee this season.
63 made the cut.
The leaders in the number of submitted works were Primorsky and Khabarovsky krais, with 13 and 11 applications, respectively.
More than 60 works were nominated for the prize in three categories: “Long prose”, “Short prose”, and “Prose for children”.
Nine works made it onto the shortlist – three in each category.
Alexander Filkin (Primorsky Krai) won the long prose category with the book "Inscription on the Gospel".
The prize for the winner was presented by Deputy Prime Minister, Plenipotentiary Representative of the President of the Russian Federation in the Far Eastern Federal District, Yuri Trutnev.
In the “Short prose” category, the best was recognized as Lyubov Bezbakh (Sakhalin Oblast) with the work “Whisper of the night rain”.
She received the award from Russian Minister for the Development of the Far East and the Arctic, Alexey Chekunkov.
In the "Children's prose" category, the winner was the Zabaykalsky writer Nina Belomestnova and her "Golden thread".
The author was awarded by the scriptwriter, writer, candidate of philological sciences and chairman of the jury of the Prize, Andrei Gelasimov.
All winners will receive 500,000 rubles.
Recall that within the framework of the “Far East” prize, the authors of the best works on the theme of the Far East are being awarded.
The main task of the prize is not only to award the winners and talk about contemporary authors, but also to attract cultural interest to the Far East, as an area of priority development in the 21st century.
Novels, novellas, collections of novellas or short stories, as well as non-fiction prose and memoirs are eligible.
However, the place of residence of the author is not important, the main thing is to write in the Russian language.
The official website of the prize: https://премияарсеньева.рф/.
Frying pan, d=22 cm, with handle, colour dark marble, 4278884.
Kukmara's "marbled" cookware is made of cast aluminum and coated with an innovative water-based marble non-stick coating reinforced with super-hard particles of minerals.
Features of the "Marble" dishware series.
The significant thickness of the walls and bottom excludes deformation of the body, guarantees durability, and provides the necessary strength of the coating.
High-strength non-stick marble coating based on water is reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
Eco-friendly non-stick coating without PFOA (perfluorooctanoic acid).
Ideal heat distribution across the entire surface of the cookware, long-lasting heat retention.
The ability to use the minimum amount of fat.
The non-stick marble coating is applied by spraying, which guarantees the exceptional durability of the coating during use.
Minor scratches and small scuffs on the surface of the pan do not affect the properties of the non-stick coating and the durability of the cookware.
The products do not burn and retain their flavor.
The ability to cook tasty and healthy food without adding oil, like on hot stones.
The thickened bottom is up to 6 mm.
It has high thermal conductivity and is ergonomic.
Ease of cleaning.
Suitable for all types of hobs except induction.
Can be washed in a dishwasher.
The wall consists of 6 layers, and the inner coating is “marble”.
A high-strength, water-based, non-stick coating reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
A strengthened layer of soil.
A layer with a rough surface for better adhesion of the coating.
The cast aluminium body is up to 6mm thick.
The outer non-stick coating is "marble".
Kukmara's kitchenware will turn the ordinary cooking process into a pleasant and easy task for any housewife.
Years... a long time ago, I did the same renovation.
Joined the living room with the kitchen.
It's a three-room apartment.
It was.
Of course, the project, permission, new technical passport, everything according to the law.
They made a bookcase and large walk-in closet in the hallway.
The door to the kitchen was bricked up, and a lot of space was created.
In almost 10 years of living in this apartment we have never regretted our decision.
From mistakes - instead of a bath they installed a steep shower cabin.
I regret it a hundred times!
I only recently realised that I love rum.
But the beautiful world of rum has yet to open up to me, except for Bacardi and Captain Morgan.
What else would you recommend, and where would you start this wonderful acquaintance?
I've had it too.
I won't get vaccinated.
He came to Chernomorskoe for ‘rehabilitation’.
Only the weather didn't work out...
The houses are pretty, but normal birds won't nest in the bright houses because they attract a lot of attention, ask the ornithologists.
In addition, the paint and other chemical compounds will deter the birds.
Only natural materials and natural colors.
Thank you, I will definitely try it.
What does Japan have to do with it?
Thanks for the recipe.
And what kind of apples should I use for this recipe?
It's really delicious.
I add a little more onion and a green apple.
Try it.
Recently, the zombie box said that the production of cars is experiencing an unprecedented shortage of semiconductors.
A table appeared on the screen, showing which country produces what percentage of these semiconductors (presumably chips-microcontrollers).
Russia was not on this list.
That is how it is!
In the United States, with their expensive labor force, it is profitable, but in Russia, it is not profitable!
And my mother-in-law tormented me.
I feel sorry for her; she is not with us.
If I had seen the good in her, things could have been different.
But apart from hatred, gossip, and scandals, there is nothing else to remember.
I feel sorry for her, she lived her life in anger.
"Mercedes" has filed a protest against the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
The German Mercedes team, whose driver Lewis Hamilton finished second at the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix behind Red Bull driver Max Verstappen, has lodged a protest against the final race result, reports the Formula 1 press service.
"Mercedes" considers that "Formula 1" rules 48.12 and 48.8 were broken during the race.
In the first case, the German team is challenging the judges' decision to return the round-the-track riders to one lap behind the leaders.
According to the second version, Verstappen overtook Hamilton before the permitted "restart" zone.
We'll add that now the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, according to which Verstappen beat Hamilton by 2.256 seconds and won the Formula 1 world championship, are preliminary, when the Mercedes protests will be considered is unknown.
G7 warned Russia of responsibility for invasion of Ukraine
G7 foreign ministers warned of "serious consequences" for Russia if it continued military aggression against Ukraine, the final statement said.
The participants of the meeting also noted that they condemn the strengthening of the Russian armed forces on the borders of the country.
"There should be no doubt in Russia's mind that further military aggression against Ukraine will have massive consequences and severe costs," a statement published on the UK government website said.
G7 ministers and the EU's top diplomat said they were "united in their condemnation of Russian military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine."
British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss, speaking at a press conference in Liverpool, warned of "serious consequences" for Russia in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
We've made it clear that any invasion will have massive consequences...
The G7 wants Russia to stop its aggression against Ukraine," she said (quoted by TASS).
Earlier at the summit in Liverpool, the foreign ministers of the G7 agreed that to resolve the crisis due to the build-up of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine, the parties must return to the negotiating table.
It was about talks in the “Normandy format”.
The North Atlantic Alliance has also called for dialogue on Ukraine in the "Normandy format".
Russian Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said that by calling on Russia and Ukraine to return to the negotiating table, the G7 countries "signed up to their own inability to take responsibility for their own mistakes."
Homsu Diamond waist bag.
The Diamond waist bag is perfect for sports, travel or just going for a walk.
It's convenient to take with you, it's roomy, and it's made from a durable and lightweight fabric.
The main compartment opens with a zip, which is easy to do even on the go.
The stylish and bright design will be perfect for those ladies who really have a fine taste for accessories.
The bag has a universal size of 19x12x7 cm and a belt length of 40 to 60 cm, which allows it to accommodate various items, from a passport to a mobile phone.
The material makes the belt bag easy to wash with common household products.
For convenience, you can use a special size adjuster for the strap.
Methods for returning money stolen through online stores have been revealed
There are several ways to get your money back from an online store and not become a victim of fraud in the future.
Experts in information security revealed them in a conversation with RBC.
For example, to reduce the risk of major losses in the event of a bank card falling into the hands of a criminal, it is recommended to keep the main funds on a card or a bank account that is not used for online shopping.
Some of your savings can be put into a savings account and withdrawn as needed.
Experts also recommend having a separate card for online purchases.
If the money was stolen while making purchases in shops that do not use the 3D Secure security technology, it is possible to start a refund procedure.
"According to the rules established by payment systems for unauthorized transactions conducted without the use of 3D Secure, responsibility lies with the participant in the payment chain who does not use this service," clarified a representative of Promsvyazbank.
An expert from the international payment provider Ecommpay, Artur Zaremba, emphasized that the buyer has the right to submit an application to the bank to dispute the fraudulent operation no later than 120 days after the purchase.
In addition, if the criminal used the card on online resources that do not require two-factor authentication, the transaction can be challenged and the money returned.
It is noted that in some cases, online stores themselves will return funds to the client if the order has not yet been sent for delivery.
On November 19, a member of the Public Chamber and director of the League for a Safe Internet, Ekaterina Mizulina, reported that in 2021 alone, 11,000 appeals were received on various cases of fraud: from the sale of fake documents to the theft of personal data.
In her opinion, an effective solution in the current circumstances could be the creation of a single window for complaints about online fraudsters.
Scholz arrives in Poland to discuss Nord Stream 2 and EU legislation
Newly elected German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw for talks on the migrant crisis on the border with Belarus, the independence of the judiciary in Poland, the build-up of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine and the situation with the Russian Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline.
While Scholz has spoken of his desire to maintain good relations between Germany and Poland for many years to come, the leaders of the two countries have made no secret of their expectations of each other.
The Prime Minister of Poland, Mateusz Morawiecki, has stated that he will call on Scholz to speak out against "Nord Stream 2," through which Russian gas is expected to be delivered to Germany bypassing Ukraine.
According to Morawiecki, Russia can use the gas pipeline against Europe as a means of political pressure.
In turn, Germany has supported Poland’s efforts to stop the flow of migrants trying to enter the country from Belarus.
Berlin has stated that it will assist Warsaw and Brussels in resolving this crisis.
Poland's judicial system, however, remains a point of contention.
The European Court has fined Poland, finding that judicial reforms carried out by the right-wing Law and Justice party violate EU law.
Poland refused to pay the fine, and its highest court ruled that national law takes precedence over EU rules.
Germany's new government, sworn in on Wednesday, has not publicly committed to halting the Nord Stream 2 pipeline in the event of a Russian invasion of Ukraine, despite calls from Poland and the United States.
U.S. officials have told members of Congress that they have reached an understanding with Germany to halt the Nord Stream 2 pipeline if Russia invades Ukraine, a senior U.S. congressional aide said on Tuesday.
German officials did not confirm the reports, but Scholz warned of consequences if Russia crossed into Ukraine on Wednesday, a position confirmed by G7 representatives on Sunday.
Dmitry, pay closer attention.
The view outside the window is the same, and the size of the window has not changed.
We removed the wall between the kitchen and the room, so the second window is partially visible.
But, in general, those who are not familiar with the initial planning are in doubt.
And I know such apartments very well, and I can see very clearly how it was reconfigured.
Let everything be good for them.
It always surprises me when they write about ways to clean the sink, the toilet, window sills, and faucets.
You wash them once a year on Easter, or something like that, and you have to scrub them clean.
Just don't get dirty.
The Ministry of Digital Development wants to give writers residencies
The state will transfer federal property to the future Fund for the Support of Russian Writers, which was left over from the Union of Writers of the USSR and the Literary Fund of the USSR.
Writing residencies will be created on its basis, the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media, which will become the founder of the fund, reported to Parlamentskaya Gazeta.
The Ministry of Digital Development is preparing a draft presidential decree on the creation of a fund to support Russian writers.
The explanatory note specifies that the fund will be tasked with taking care of the target use and preservation of buildings and structures that once belonged to the Soviet Union of Writers and the Literary Fund.
“A significant number of immovable property objects, which previously belonged to the USSR Literary Fund, have been transferred to the ownership of the Russian Federation, including objects located in the Peredelkino writers’ village, the Komarovo settlement in the Leningrad Region, and others”, the press service of the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications and Mass Media told Parlamentskaya Gazeta.
The draft decree states that the charter of the Fund should reflect that it is “established for the purpose of supporting literary activity by creating the necessary conditions for the creative work of writers”.
"The creation of conditions for creative activity implies the creation of writers' residencies on the basis of the transferred property in different regions of Russia, where there would be comfortable conditions for creativity", the Ministry of Digital Development explained to our publication.
520 rubles for one sliced tomato?
A cheese pancake is literally a slice of dough from a pack for 550 roubles.
3 pieces of fish in a measuring cup for 570…
No, it certainly looks delicious, but the price is just ridiculous.
Apparently, all the rich people have gathered on Belorusskaya.
Doctors warn of risk of long-term use of blood thinners after COVID-19, before vaccination
Doctors Irina Yartseva and Sergei Tokarev have warned of the danger of uncontrolled use of blood-thinning drugs after infection with the COVID-19 coronavirus and before vaccination against the coronavirus.
The physician-therapist, immunologist Irina Yartseva told that the independent prevention of the possible formation of blood clots after COVID-19 may provoke a stroke.
Yartseva explained that blood-thinning drugs are not given to everyone, only if the patient was hospitalized, was in the hospital, and had complications.
Doctors prescribe anticoagulants (blood thinners that prevent the formation of excessive clots) as indicated.
She reported that now there is a kind of ignorance - everyone is taking anti-coagulants for a long time and getting complications in the form of hemorrhagic strokes (bleeding in the brain) as a result.
The chief health resort doctor of the Urals Federal District, the scientific director of the Society of Specialists in Preventive Medicine, a doctor of medical sciences, Sergey Tokarev, told URA.RU in an interview that Russians are now often taking anticoagulants at random, even before vaccination against the coronavirus infection.
According to Dr. Tokarev, citizens believe dubious advice on the Internet and start to self-medicate.
There are such citizens who, on their own decision, start taking anticoagulants a week before vaccination.
And during the preliminary examination before the vaccination, the doctors notice the bruises.
He stressed that it is extremely dangerous to take any medication without finding out the reason for the appearance of any symptom.
Potatoes were named a superfood to protect against hypertension
Research has shown that regular consumption of this common and affordable vegetable can significantly reduce the risk of cardiovascular disease.
Potatoes are in every kitchen and have amazing properties.
The product is rich in vitamins and trace elements that promote the functioning of internal organs.
It helps with heart disease by improving circulation and lowering cholesterol, reports the Semana portal.
Today, heart disease is the leading cause of premature death in humans.
To improve the situation, it is not only necessary to treat, but also to eat properly.
One of the helpers in such a situation will be ordinary potatoes.
According to the scientists, this root vegetable is very rich in vitamins B1, B3, B6, and also contains a very important vitamin C for the body.
In addition, potatoes contain phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, as well as riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
Trace elements help all the body's internal systems to work effectively.
Among other things, the root vegetable fights against natural age-related disorders in the body, and contains a lot of beneficial fibre for the digestive system.
When consumed regularly, it can be a preventative for atherosclerosis and hypertension.
I had such a case.
A lady came to look at the apartment.
I came from another city to show it to her.
The listing included detailed photos and a description of the apartment.
She was left extremely dissatisfied, because there was no "glamorous" kitchen and "glamorous" balcony.
It seems that the aunt has nothing to do, so she is looking at other people's apartments, and people are wasting their time.
Around 145,000 adolescents received the first component of the COVID-19 vaccine in Kazakhstan
Information about the vaccination of teenagers, pregnant and breastfeeding women against the coronavirus in Kazakhstan has been published, the Kazinform news agency reports, citing the COVID-19 Non-Proliferation Commission.
Twenty people have died from the coronavirus and pneumonia in one day in Kazakhstan. 85 patients with the coronavirus are in a critical condition – the Ministry of Health of the Republic of Kazakhstan. Most of the regions of Kazakhstan are in the “green zone” for the coronavirus.
As of December 11, 2021, 181,037 people have received the first component of the Pfizer vaccine, and 14,580 people have received the second component.
Of these, the first dose: teenagers - 144,613, pregnant women - 10,645, breastfeeding women - 25,779.
Second dose: adolescents - 10,690, pregnant women - 1,141, breastfeeding women - 2,749.
The plumber who found the money in the church wall will receive $20,000
The plumber who found the money in the wall of the church in the American state of Texas will receive a reward.
This is reported in a press release from the non-profit organization Crime Stoppers of Houston.
The incident occurred at a large evangelical church in Lakewood, where Pastor Joel Osteen preaches that devout Christians will be rewarded with wealth and prosperity.
In November 2021, plumber Justin Cooley was repairing one of the church's toilets and discovered, under the insulation, thousands of packages with money and checks.
He turned the find over to the church and, he says, didn't even get a thank-you from Austin.
"I wanted to hear him say, "You know, Justin, you did the right thing.
We understand what you did and what you could have done," KPRC-TV quoted him as saying.
The find appears to be linked to a theft that took place at Lakewood Church seven years ago.
At that time, about $200,000 in cash and $400,000 in checks were stolen from the church safe.
The money was insured, so the church did not suffer a loss.
However, a reward of $25,000 was offered for information about the perpetrators.
Justin Cowley was ineligible for the amount since the award had already expired.
Despite this, the non-profit organization Crime Stoppers of Houston, which originally offered a $5,000 reward and later received another $20,000 donation from the Lakewood Church, decided to reward the plumber's honesty.
He will receive $20,000.
Earlier, it was reported that the police questioned Pastor Joel Osteen about the money found in the wall of the Lakewood Church.
Tanya’s statements and actions are her characterisation as a ‘real person’.
That is why the attitude towards it is so negative.
And it’s not because “she is financially significantly richer than all the writers”, as they write here.
There are people who are richer, but not all of them behave so brazenly, so defiantly as this lady.
The Promtex-Orient Soft Cocos 1 mattress, size 190х190.
Spring orthopedic mattress Soft Cocos 1.
It is based on the TFK block (256 springs per square metre).
Independent springs allow for proper load distribution.
Coconut coir (a material made from the fibers of a coconut palm) is used as a filler.
Layers of felt are placed between the filler and the spring unit.
Both sides of the mattress are above average firmness.
Jacquard Sense removable cover: 5% cotton, 95% polyester.
The density of the fabric is 116 g/m².
Again, it's simple and delicious.
I was looking for chicken recipes on your page.
They gave us a chicken.
Our friends grew it on their farm.
It weighs more than four kilograms.
I want to make it tastier.
I want to find a recipe for beer-can chicken.
Have you tried it?
I trust you more than just the recipes "from the Internet."
New case of human infection with bird flu virus recorded in China
A new case of human infection with a highly pathogenic avian influenza H5N6 virus has been recorded in China.
This was reported by the RTHK radio station, citing a notification from the Hong Kong Department of Health, reports TASS.
The 68-year-old resident of Huizhou urban district in southern Guangdong province was infected with the disease, who kept poultry at home.
His condition is described by doctors as critical.
The first human case of the H5N6 virus strain was recorded in May 2014 in the southwestern province of Sichuan.
Since then, the number of such cases in the country has risen to 53.
Brazil requires citizens to present vaccination passports when entering the country
In Brazil, it has been made mandatory for those entering the country to present a COVID-19 passport; the Federal Supreme Court of Brazil (STF) Judge Luiz Roberto Barroso issued a corresponding decision.
This is reported by CNN Brasil.
Citizens with contraindications to vaccination are exempt from presenting a vaccination certificate.
The list of exemptions also includes people arriving from countries where the vaccine has been proven to be absent.
"The situation is even more serious if we consider that Brazil is a popular tourist destination for New Year's Eve, pre-carnival and carnival parties, as well as other events, which suggests an increase in tourist flow," said Barros.
Previously, the Brazilian authorities have made it mandatory for tourists who have not been vaccinated against COVID-19 to observe a five-day quarantine.
The scheme for full protection from COVID-19 has been revealed
The virologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Honoured Science Worker of Russia Anatoly Altshtein, in conversation with Ura.ru, revealed the scheme for complete protection from the coronavirus infection.
According to him, this can be achieved by giving an injection and using a nasal vaccine.
When administered intranasally, large amounts of IgA are produced. This does not happen when the vaccine is injected.
Immunoglobulin A protects the mucous membranes, so the virus cannot get into the body.
And inside, after vaccination, we produce the most G immunoglobulins (antibodies).
And if you give both vaccines, you will get a lot of IgA and IgG. But there is no decision yet on double vaccination," the doctor explained.
The chief health resort doctor of the Urals Federal District, Doctor of Medical Sciences Sergey Tokarev, in turn, stated that the main advantage of using nasal vaccination in conjunction with an injection is the ability to stop being a carrier of COVID-19.
He added that this would help as the body's defences would then supposedly be at their peak.
Earlier, the Nizhny Novgorod Minister of Health, David Melik-Guseynov, said that the new wave of the COVID-19 pandemic will be caused by the spread of the new coronavirus infection among children.
According to him, such a picture is observed in other countries, where the next wave of the pandemic came earlier.
Inna, hmm...
I talked to the male dog (he died a long time ago) like this - if you’re ready to exchange a warm home, food, affection, love and games for a flowing bitch, then go ahead.
But Pesel was trained, and he was an all-round smart guy.
I chose my company and went home.
In the video, the method that works in 90% of cases.
Believe me, it wasn't pulled out of thin air.
I stopped many owners from running after their dogs, even though they were saying that 200,000 were running away (pomskies), I literally took them by the hand and led them in another direction.
In the end, the “200 thousand” was choosing the owner, and not the dog that was running somewhere there.
Mass protests against vaccination continue in Europe
In the Austrian capital of Vienna, more than 40,000 demonstrators took to the streets.
They expressed dissatisfaction with the restrictive measures and the government's plans to make COVID-19 vaccination compulsory.
From February next year, unvaccinated people will have to pay a fine of 3,600 euros.
Spanish people, outraged by the government's healthcare policy, held a peaceful march in Madrid.
Some held up signs that read "This is a fake pandemic," "I will not be vaccinated."
A large-scale protest against sanitary passports took place in Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia.
In the autonomous community, the COVID-19 certificate is mandatory to access bars, restaurants, gyms, nursing homes and nightclubs.
The decision to introduce sanitary passports was made by the authorities of several regions of the country against the backdrop of an increase in the number of cases of infection with the coronavirus.
In Luxembourg, more than a thousand demonstrators protested against the tightening of restrictive measures and QR codes.
The action started peacefully, but then escalated into clashes with law enforcement officers.
A group of protesters started throwing stones at the police.
In response, law enforcement officers used water cannons.
Nikolai S., even on Wikipedia there is no consensus on this matter.
Kashchevarova-Rudneva is also marked as "the first Russian doctor, doctor of medicine", probably because she began her studies earlier.
Let's just not argue, I think they both deserve the title.
The only thing I agree with Zakharova on is that the Americans only brought death and plunder to any country they appeared in.
Lonax Cocos TFK 130x185 mattress.
A symmetrical mattress made from natural coconut coir on a TFK spring block.
The mattress is firm, with layers of natural coconut on both sides.
The mattress is based on a block of independent TFK springs.
The independent springs allow for proper weight distribution and help the body take its natural shape.
The natural coconut is hypoallergenic, hygienic and has excellent ventilation.
The natural jacquard case is dense, wear-resistant, and pleasant to the touch.
It is bad and sad to age alone, but it is inevitable, unfortunately.
It's very sad when you read about it.
A person should live as long as they can take care of themselves and not be a burden to anyone.
Good health to all.
The WHO has already discovered "omicron" in more than sixty countries
The World Health Organization (WHO) has stated that the new omicron variant of coronavirus has already been detected in 63 countries.
A number of experts have already said that the spread of the new strain could have catastrophic consequences.
The WHO reported on the rate of spread of the strain.
According to the organization, as of December 9, the strain has already been identified in 63 countries, in all six WHO regions.
This is despite the fact that it only began to spread actively at the end of November.
WHO is also concerned about the rapid spread of the new variant of the coronavirus.
WHO experts express concern that the new strain, according to preliminary data, may be more widespread than the "Delta" strain, also known as the Indian variant of the coronavirus, which is currently leading in all countries without exception.
Previously, the Director-General of the World Health Organization, Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, stated that the omicron strain is capable of having a significant impact on the course of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The UK also came to a similar conclusion.
Experts at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM) believe that "omicron" will displace "delta" in the coming months.
And the number of people infected in Britain alone will be about 1 million. This is despite the fact that officially "omicron" is currently affecting several hundred people in the Kingdom, and according to estimates, up to 10,000.
British experts predict tens of thousands of deaths from the “omicron” strain, and at the peak more than 2,000 people will be taken to hospital every day.
Which the British healthcare system will not be able to cope with.
The situation is further complicated by the fact that, according to the latest research, the effectiveness of the Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the "omicron" strain is 32 times lower in comparison with other types of the disease.
It is unknown how the Russian “Sputnik V” reacts to “omicron” – this will become clear in the next few weeks.
The Gamaleya Center has just begun testing the Russian vaccine on the "omicron" strain.
Why do we need to see the stages of aging?
It would be better to see the performance of your exercises in more detail.
It's unclear in the first exercise how to do it: sitting on your heels or standing on your knees, as it says, but then how do you press your hands against your thighs?
Or hands on the hips?
Curious Squirrel, you're right, online communication is completely different, it's easy and natural, and in person, there's nothing to say.
And seeing a person in person, maybe it’s not what you expected, it didn’t grab you - and that’s where the attitude comes from.
When she meets her man, her eyes will change.
And once again, the Soviet period is being called “the time of devils”.
Then, people believed in God much more honestly than they do today.
And we were raised practically according to God's law (love your neighbour, don't steal, etc.).
What is the ideology today - money at any cost.
Globa is the kind of chatterbox who has little faith (or none at all), but even if that’s the case, the time of the devil came in the 1990s...
Our St. Petersburg, more precisely Leningrad, communal apartment on Bolshaya Zelenina is still in touch.
Of course, we are not the closest of friends, but we try to maintain warm relations with the older generation.
Perhaps this is due to the fact that there were no visitors in the apartment, rooms were not rented out, and the blockade brotherhood was not abolished.
Unfortunately, we see each other more and more at funerals.
Lara Angelskaya, come on!
Human babies, especially the males, are strong, active, energetic, rambunctious, pushy, scrappy, and fighty, just like their little "cousins" in the wild!
The only drawback is that they are not as soft as puppies or kittens, so bruises, bumps, and scratches are common, and no boomerang!
And why should they?
Did the little brother push him without thinking?
And you are always so dexterous that you have never accidentally hurt anyone and have never injured yourself?
SkySleep Wave Space BS 150x185 cm mattress.
The Bonnell Wave Space BS (Wave Space BS) spring mattress has a medium firmness on both sides.
The comfort layers of the mattress - a combination of a coconut plate and artificial latex with a relief surface - ErgoFoam.
The case is made of cotton fabric with a jacquard weave.
It is strong, wear-resistant, and at the same time allows air to pass through well, not interfering with the ventilation of the mattress.
The cover is quilted with polyester, which makes it soft.
A practical mattress for the bedroom.
The coir of the coconut has antimicrobial properties, it is hard and evenly distributes the weight on it.
Artificial latex with a cell-cut surface provides the mattress with a micro-massage effect.
Long-lasting materials, reliable construction.
The Bonnell block, in which the springs are connected to each other, is characterized by reliability, it withstands large loads, it is well suited for couples with a small difference in weight.
The perimeter of the item is reinforced with a polyurethane foam box - it extends the life of the mattress and protects the springs from edge deformation.
Israeli PM Bennett announces start of vaccinations in schools
Israel's Health Ministry began an emergency program to increase vaccinations on Sunday.
From the morning of December 12, vaccination against the coronavirus is taking place in schools throughout Israel.
The prime minister of the Jewish state, Naftali Bennett, said at today's cabinet meeting that the issue of vaccinating the fourth dose of citizens at risk will also be examined.
In Israel, mass vaccination of the population from the COVID-19 coronavirus infection began on December 20, 2020.
Israelis are being vaccinated with the Pfizer drug.
From 10 January last year, vaccinated people began to receive the second dose.
The vaccination of 12-15-year-olds in this country began in early June this year.
To date, more than 5.78 million people have received two doses of the vaccine, while more than 4.12 million citizens have received the third one.
Anna Gauwer, well, probably the tick won’t crawl into the trap; it is a SPIDER-LIKE creature, as LYLIA put it.
In any case, I don't see the tick.
But I'm curious, what if there is?
We need to give him something else to tempt him
Dimax Genius children's mattress 70x190
Children's two-sided mattress with natural latex and natural coconut coir on an EVS500 independent spring unit.
Children's spring-free latex and coir mattress on an independent spring unit.
Natural latex is a soft elastic material that is environmentally friendly, hypoallergenic, and has excellent properties that make sleep as comfortable as possible.
The flip side is a medium-firm mattress that is comfortable, made from natural coconut fibre and latex.
The basis of the mattress is a block of independent springs.
The springs distribute the load as accurately and evenly as possible across the surface of the mattress, supporting the body in its natural position.
A great option for school children and adolescents.
The case is made of polycotton.
The material is strong, wear-resistant and not subject to abrasion.
Seven people died in Brazil as a result of downpours
At least seven people have died and 175 have been injured as a result of heavy rainfall which has hit the north-eastern Brazilian state of Bahia and neighbouring Minas Gerais.
This is reported by TASS, citing rescue services.
An extratropical cyclone has been raging in the border region of these states since the middle of the week, as a result of which the level of precipitation in the region has reached 450 mm. A state of emergency has been declared in 25 municipalities in the state of Bahia, and in some of them the floods have been the most destructive in 35 years.
Several bridges, two dams, and three roads have been destroyed by the element.
According to the rescuers, about 5,700 people were left homeless, and another 6,700 were forced to leave their homes.
The damage caused by the natural disaster affected more than 85,000 residents of the region.
Nika Lerman, I know the Levomekol ointment, I work with drugs.
It's good for reducing inflammation.
Personally, I prefer Bepanthen for the regeneration of superficial wounds and bruises, but you know better what is more effective.
The main thing is that the healing process is going well, it was just awful with such a hole.
Hello, Spain, you didn't hear me and you didn't understand me.
I'll answer with the lines of M. Isakovsky: "Migratory birds fly\nIn search of the past summer.\n
They fly to hot countries,\nBut I don't want to fly away,\nBut I stay with you,\nMy dear side!\n
I don't need a foreign sun,\nI don't need foreign land".
And believe me that photos from the park where I went skiing or my city will be just as good.
In fact, it would be much more interesting to see your wonderful house with its interiors.
Wax crayons MAPED (France) Color'peps Twist, 12 colors, twistable, in a plastic case.
A set of 12 bright wax crayons in a plastic casing with a twist-up barrel.
They do not crumble, do not dirty the hands, and are absolutely safe.
They do not require sharpening.
The body is made of high-quality, durable plastic.
Multi-use packaging: a zip-lock bag.
$135 billion spent on apps - Hi-Tech
In 2021, user spending on apps grew by 25% worldwide, while the number of downloads grew by 8%.
The most popular services in the world turned out to be various video services.
Most users downloaded the video editor CapCut, while spending the most on YouTube.
Both the number of app downloads and user spending in them have shown significant growth during the period from January to November 2021.
The number of downloads increased by 8%, reaching 140 billion. User spending in applications grew even more significantly: by 25%, up to a record $135 billion.
Such data was published by the analytical company App Annie, which presented a report on the mobile app market in 2021.
In 2021, the world economy came out of lockdown and began post-pandemic recovery.
“Will such a ‘return to the physical’ slow the growth of the app economy? Not at all”, the authors of the report believe.
India was the leader in the number of app downloads, accounting for about 20% of all downloads.
It is followed by the United States (9%) and Brazil (8%).
iOS users, as always, spent more than Android users: 65% of all app spending was on iOS.
Among applications, the video editor CapCut took first place in terms of the number of downloads in 2021.
It is followed by two Indian apps: video service MX TakaTak and e-commerce app Meesho.
Telegram is also in the top 10 by number of downloads.
In general, if we judge by the number of downloads, VPN services are popular among users (there are two in the top 10 - VPN Master and NightOwl VPN) and services related to creating and broadcasting videos (in addition to CapCut and MX TakaTak, there are two more such services in the top 10 - Moj and SnackVideo).
“Users spent the most on apps for live streaming and online streaming,” the report’s authors note.
YouTube is in the lead here, the top 5 in terms of user spending also includes the video service TikTok, the streaming video services Disney+ and HBO Max, as well as the Japanese manga subscription service Piccoma.
Telegram, Instagram, Zoom, and TikTok are in the top places by the number of monthly active users, with the mobile version of Microsoft Office in fifth place.
In Russia, the shopping app AliExpress was the leader in terms of number of downloads in a year.
It is followed by the Zenly service, which shows the location of friends, and the same CapCut.
Also in the top 10 apps are: online karaoke StarMaker, online clothing retailer Shein, Maps for Minecraft PE app, online taxi service DiDi, Pure Tuber YouTube client, Dixy retailer app, and Samokat online store.
People around the world have adapted to the pandemic through the transition to mobile life, which can be called one of the main conclusions.
The most successful industries were those that helped people feel closer to each other, both virtually and in-person," commented App Annie’s head of market insights, Lexi Sydow, on the results of the report.
The revenue of the mobile game sector in 2021 reached $90 billion. The leaders in terms of downloads were casual and hyper-casual games, in which there is no or almost no plot, and the video presentation is minimal.
Count Masters, Project Makeover and Bridge Race made it into the top three most popular games in the world.
In Russia, DOP 2: Delete One Part, Going Balls, and Phone Case DIY are the most popular games.
Earlier, App Annie presented its forecast for 2022.
Among the main trends for next year, the company's analysts named the growth in the number of TikTok users to 1.5 billion, the growing popularity among Generation Z of financial apps, such as the Robinhood investment app, as well as the further increase in the popularity of metaverse mobile games.
Clan De File dog treat with beef, 30 pieces, 40 g each.
A natural dried treat for dogs of all breeds and ages made from beef.
The Clan De File is a beef fillet for dogs, and nothing more.
A natural dried treat for dogs of all breeds and ages.
Only one kind of protein is used in its preparation - beef.
This reduces the risk of food allergies, making the treat ideal for dogs with sensitive stomachs and prone to allergic reactions.
The main ingredient of the treat is a piece of meat that has been processed according to the quality standards that are used when preparing food for humans - human grade.
Recommended daily ration: no more than 10% of the daily ration of an adult animal.
Calories: 407.
Ingredients: beef fillet.
Nutritional value: protein - 57, fat - 17, ash - 4, moisture - 20.
Russians warned about new scam scheme
Criminals have begun looking for new ways to commit fraud in video messages.
Izvestia writes about this, citing experts.
According to Ivideon product director Zaur Abutalimov, the main danger associated with the spread of video communication tools are deepfakes.
In this case, the fraudsters create a fake video based on real recordings involving the victim.
This allows the neural network to accurately reproduce the features of a person's behavior.
Abutalimov added that using deepfake, criminals can make video calls to the victim's acquaintances or create a video with a copy of the person for distribution with the aim of blackmail.
"These fakes could easily trigger bullying, as a savvy perpetrator could place people in embarrassing, dangerous or compromising fake scenarios," the expert said.
Varonis senior systems engineer Alexander Vetkol noted that psychologically, people tend to trust others more when they can see them.
He stressed that this could create specific risks in the case of video-based technologies.
David, I'll add.
In what I wrote above, I focused on the fact that I bought all of this in a small town, where the local mentality didn't allow for a lot of makeup and wearing short skirts, showing stockings and pantyhose on the legs.
It was a province, but the store USED to have such an item.
In big cities, Muslim women painted themselves and showed their butts.
And it is the same in Dushanbe, it is a large city and the capital of the republic.
There are a lot of fashionistas, but there is no cosmetics.
Five things to do to avoid diabetes
Problems with blood sugar levels are some of the most common in the world.
But some don't care, and they're wrong.
Diabetes can lead to serious complications and even death over time.
Preventive measures play the main role in preventing the formation of diseases.
For example, doctors recommend changing the drinking regime - reducing the amount of various drinks and switching to regular water has a positive effect on metabolism.
Sugary foods raise blood sugar levels to dangerous levels when consumed in excess.
Therefore, the first step towards a healthy lifestyle is to stop buying sweets and keeping them at home.
The appearance of the disease is affected not only by an incorrect diet, but also by habits.
To reduce the risk of diabetes, it is necessary to move a lot.
Experts recommend sticking to a low-carb diet.
This kind of diet not only helps to lose weight, but also protects against sharp fluctuations in sugar levels.
In order to protect yourself from diabetes, you must eat a lot of fiber.
Dietary fiber fills the stomach and thus promotes the feeling of satiety, the release of digestive juices and the increased absorption of food.
Tomato seeds Gavrish Pink Bush F1 0.10 g, item number 4241014.
A low-growing, early beefsteak tomato with heavy fruit set for growing in the open and under temporary plastic covers.
The plant is determinate, with short internodes.
The fruits are large, deep pink in colour, quite dense, weighing 180-210 g, protected from sunburn by the leaves, and store well.
The meat is juicy, with a sugary taste.
The hybrid is resistant to a complex of diseases.
It is recommended for use in salads, appetizers, and as a garnish.
Sowing for seedlings: at the end of March – beginning of April.
Thinning out - at the stage of the first true leaf.
The seedlings are planted in greenhouses in May.
After planting in the open ground, plants are shaped and tied.
MK SLAVDA FC-160.
This freezer has an A energy efficiency rating, which means it uses noticeably less electricity to run.
The freezer is suitable for both a house and an apartment thanks to the use of high-quality low-noise compressors and excellent sound insulation.
The camera works no louder than a normal refrigerator.
The quick freeze function freezes food in the shortest possible time, preserving the maximum amount of nutrients.
The Slavda FC-160 freezer meets the N/ST climate class, which means that it can operate without problems at a room temperature of up to +38 degrees.
Digital control panel with automatic temperature control.
Dr. Pavlova spoke about "weekend migraines" in workaholics
There are several factors that can lead to feeling worse over the weekend
The reason for the deterioration of health after working days is often "weekend migraine," explained the well-known endocrinologist, candidate of medical sciences, senior researcher at the Faculty of Fundamental Medicine of Moscow State University, and head of the Systemic Medicine Clinic, Zhura Pavlova, in her Telegram channel.
According to her, workaholics suffer from this particularly often, who have headaches, fatigue and weakness on weekends.
Doctor Pavlov noted that in addition to the fatigue accumulated over the week, there are quite a few objective reasons for the negative reaction of the body to a change in conditions.
On the weekend, our lives change dramatically.
"We sleep for a long time, lie on the couch all day, probably eat more, and drink less," the doctor argued. "Because of the lack of coffee, there is a slight withdrawal.
From overeating and not enough water - heavy and broken."
The late rise also plays a role.
For example, if you get up three hours later than usual, you will experience a reaction known as jet lag.
It is experienced by travellers who cross multiple time zones.
In order to determine which of the factors is playing a decisive role in the worsening of the mood, Pavlov recommended tracking what changes the most on weekends.
Benartti Optimal Hard S1000 130х185 mattress.
The reinforced perimeter of high density foam significantly increases the lifespan of the mattress.
The "Optimal Hard S1000" mattress, with different firmness sides, total height of the mattress is 23 cm.
The maximum permissible load on a single bed is 140 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per sleeping place).
Each spring is in its own fabric pocket, which allows the body's weight to be distributed properly.
To provide additional protection to the spring unit, an insulating layer of felt has been added to separate the mattress fillings from the springs.
On one side of the mattress is a 2 cm layer of coconut coir that adds extra firmness and durability to the mattress.
Cotton jacquard, quilted with 2 cm of artificial latex and 1 cm of Hollcon material, for additional comfort.
On the other side of the mattress is a 1 cm thick layer of coconut coir and a layer of felt has been used.
The fabric is treated with a special antibacterial impregnation Sanitized (Sweden).
Impregnation provides complete destruction of mold, does not allow the development of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning it over, as well as ventilators for additional ventilation of the layers.
South African scientists say Pfizer vaccine is less effective against 'Omicron'
South Africa reports low effectiveness of Pfizer vaccine against "omicron"
South African scientists conducted a study and reported on the low effectiveness of the Pfizer vaccine against the omicron strain of coronavirus infection.
It is estimated that (the level of "omicron" neutralization) corresponds to (the level of) vaccine effectiveness of 22.5% against symptomatic infection, which... casts doubt on the ability of the vaccine to protect against infection, the text of the study published on the MedRxiv portal says.
However, experts clarified that the drug can save from a severe course of the disease.
Earlier, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that the omicron variant of the coronavirus could cause a new wave of the pandemic in the UK with more hospitalizations than a year ago.
How much hidden sugar is in common foods?
Sugar is not the best source of beneficial nutrients.
Its excess in the diet can lead to type 2 diabetes as well as cardiovascular and cancer diseases.
Consumers should be aware that an unfamiliar word in a product's ingredients list may be a hidden sugar - an ingredient similar to sugar in terms of calories, composition and glycemic index.
The label may list dozens of names that essentially mean sugar.
Some of the most common and frequently encountered names are glucose and fructose.
There can also be other refined sugars, such as dextrose (sugar made from corn), levulose (fruit sugar), molasses (black treacle), agave syrup, etc.
These are all simple carbohydrates, which include monosaccharides and disaccharides, and they can be found not only in pastries, but also in ketchup, hot dogs, bread, etc.
According to Rospotrebnazor, the most effective way to reduce sugar intake is to eat whole and unprocessed foods, as well as pay attention to the label and the many different names for sugar.
Different types of sugar taste different, but no matter what the ingredient is called in a product - syrup or nectar, processed or unprocessed, brown or white - it's still sugar.
It's not easy to count the exact amount of sugar as you need to take into account not only the amount of sugar stated by the manufacturer on the package, but also the fact that vegetables, fruits, etc. originally contain a certain amount of sugar.
As a result, the total amount of sugar could be significantly higher than what's listed on the label.
German Chancellor Scholz: Gas will lose its importance for Germany in 25 years
Germany's new Chancellor Olaf Scholz said that gas imports are losing importance for Germany, as the country continues its transition to decarbonization of the economy.
According to him, Germany plans to completely abandon gas, oil and coal by 2045, becoming a climate-neutral country.
“That is to say, in 25 years the world will be such that the issue of transporting gas to Germany and Europe will play a different role”, said the chancellor.
Scholz noted that Germany remains committed to the fact that Ukraine will continue to transport Russian natural gas in the future, as this resource is currently important for the energy transition.
He recalled that Germany and the United States made a statement in which Berlin's support for Ukraine's energy transformation was recorded.
Earlier, the head of the German Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Annalena Baerbock, stated that the certification process for the Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline continues.
According to the minister, within the framework of the coalition talks and the discussion of the coalition agreement, it was stated that European energy law should be applied to energy projects.
The diplomat also noted that the pipeline is not yet "in compliance" with EU regulations.
Thanks for the interesting photos!
In 1985 I had to travel to those parts.
I remember very well the CMEZ rising from the Kanatchikovo station up the hill, past an old building (similar to a signalling post, two-storey), along the Kanatchikovo road, and turning right onto Vavilov street, to the factory gates...
Hackers break into Twitter account of Indian PM
Hackers have breached the Twitter account of Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
The offenders managed to publish a fake message.
It was reported that India had supposedly recognized Bitcoin as a legitimate means of payment, and that the country had already purchased the cryptocurrency.
Modi's office was asked to ignore the new messages.
Representatives of the prime minister stated that Twitter reacted quickly - access to the account was restored.
The Prime Minister of India's page was already hacked in 2020 and called for donations to the fund via cryptocurrency.
In New Caledonia referendum, majority vote against independence
The third referendum in New Caledonia, held on 12 December, ended with the same result as the previous two.
According to the first partial results announced on Sunday, December 12 at noon, the majority of New Caledonians voted during the referendum against the independence of their territory.
However, the level of participation in this third vote was significantly lower than in the two previous ones.
According to preliminary results published by local authorities, 3.51% (2,755 people) voted in favor of New Caledonia's independence from France, while 96.49% (75,762) voted "no".
The turnout was 43.90%, with more than 80,000 residents of New Caledonia taking part in the election.
As the France-Presse agency comments on these preliminary results, "the outcome of these elections left no room for doubt," as the pro-independence supporters called on the voters to not participate in the vote.
As the initiators of the referendum, they opposed its holding on 12 December, considering that a new outbreak of the COVID-19 epidemic on the archipelago makes it impossible to conduct a full and "honest" pre-election campaign.
Thus, this abstention paved the way for a third victory for the pro-French New Caledonia, after the referendums held in November 2018 and in October 2020.
In 2018, 56.7% of residents voted against independence, in 2020 - 53.3%.
The separatists say they do not recognize the results of the latest vote and will challenge them at the United Nations.
The French president, Emmanuel Macron, is to speak on the outcome of the referendum, the Elysée Palace said on Sunday, December 12.
The issue of New Caledonia's independence has dominated recent weeks of the French presidential election campaign.
Several presidential candidates have voiced support for the territory to remain part of France, as it is "the last European Union presence in the Pacific."
"New Caledonia must remain French at all costs," Eric Zemmour repeated many times.
The same statement was made by Republican candidate Valérie Pécresse, who published a column in Le Figaro at the end of October, calling on the Caledonians to remain French.
Emmanuel Macron, for his part, announced in May 2018 that he would not take a position "because it is not his responsibility".
However, the president added: "France would be less beautiful without New Caledonia."
Prime Minister Jean Castex, for his part, expressed "a strong desire for the choice of the Caledonians to be the choice of France".
Sveta, hi!
I bullied you a little... a lot, I'm still embarrassed, I'm sorry.
Thanks for not turning away from my channel.
On the subject: I'm not an artist, I like to draw, but it turns out to be an inspired scrawl.
But as an artist - not an artist at all: what would you change here?
But don't forget that the food was NATURAL, so obesity wasn't as widespread as it is now.
But as for medicine, it was zero - leeches, garlic and infusions.
Nowadays, they would get back on their feet in no time.
And the food has absolutely nothing to do with it.
Turkey tested the world's first drone with a laser weapon
Turkey successfully tested the world's first drone with a laser weapon.
The Eren UAV was tested at a distance of 100 to 500 meters, reports MIR24.
The device is capable of neutralising explosive objects at a distance using a laser.
The maximum flight height of the new product reaches 3,000 m.
After passing the necessary tests, the UAV will be put into service with the Turkish military, which will use it to destroy explosive devices without the involvement of sappers.
The agency emphasises that Turkey is among the six countries in the world capable of developing and producing their own drones.
I cut the hunchback into steaks.
Salt, sugar, black pepper and allspice.
Sometimes I add cloves, it doesn't hurt.
In a deep bowl, I covered it with a plate.
Well, in a sense, that's it.
And why do I need this salmon, for such money, I don’t know what kind of salmon it is, excellent herring is a great fish.
Bread, butter, herring.
It's a great sandwich.
WSJ readers criticize article on Russia-U.S. relations
Readers of The Wall Street Journal criticized an article by Professor Christopher Hartwell, in which he described his vision of relations between Russia and the United States.
The author of the material expressed concern that the West is supposedly sacrificing Ukraine to Russia.
In the article, he convinced readers of the danger emanating from Moscow, and made a number of insulting remarks about Russian President Vladimir Putin.
At the end, Hartwell urged Western countries to "stand as one front against Russia."
Readers of the WSJ expressed disagreement with the position of the American professor.
“There is a lot of false information in this article”, RIA Novosti quotes one of the readers as saying.
"Europe is not ours to "lose," and Ukraine is not our land.
The U.S. and NATO allies will never go to nuclear war with Russia over Ukraine," another said.
Patches can also be applied to the lip area.
The Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch used in the production of the patch is a high-tech polymer that provides increased absorption and delivery of highly concentrated natural plant essence to the skin, closely adheres to the skin and gives a feeling of freshness.
When delivering nutrients to the skin, the hydrogel minimises the associated loss of moisture and allows the essence to penetrate into the deep layers of the skin.
SONEX 2085/EL Chandelier with Nores Dimmer
The NORES 2085/EL lamp consists of a metal base (base) and a plastic diffuser.
The diffuser material is high-quality white matte acrylic, which provides the luminaire with uniform diffusion and good light transmission.
The shape of the ceiling light: square, in the form of a relief ornament with a geometric pattern, decorated with transparent dots, giving the lit lamp a beautiful effect of "starry twinkling" and shimmering.
The IP43 rating means that the light can be used in certain areas of wet rooms.
The kit includes a replaceable LED module with lenses, rated at 72 watts, which is equivalent to a 520-watt incandescent bulb.
As well as a remote control, which is used to smoothly change the colour temperature from 3000-6000K, change the brightness, and switch between the warm/white/cold/night light modes.
Uriage Hydrating Thermal Night Face Mask 50 ml.
An ultra-hydrating night mask for all skin types, with the effect of fresh, rested and glowing skin in the morning!
Real "thermal bath" for dehydrated skin!
It tones, smooths skin relief and restores the skin barrier.
A very pleasant water-gel texture without stickiness.
An excellent skin care product after active sun exposure!
Hypoallergenic.
A 5.2 magnitude earthquake occurred in the Kuril Islands area
A 5.2-magnitude earthquake occurred near the Kuril island of Shikotan.
It is noted that the epicenter of the earthquake was located 231.8 km northeast of Severo-Kurilsk.
The epicenter lay at a depth of 92.5 km.
Earlier, seismologists recorded a 7.5-magnitude earthquake in Peru, during which ten people were injured.
If he had been born into a poor American family and tried to make it, his petty-bourgeois thinking would have been lost.
It's good when you come to America as a known person.
And if you were born there, you wouldn’t know what to fight for.
So it was in vain that he smeared the construction with dirt, bile, and poison, for no one has yet come up with a more just construction.
Ukraine will start manufacturing new-generation jet drones
A new Ukrainian-Turkish plant will begin to produce unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs) of the ANKA type.
This was reported on 11 December by the non-staff advisor to the head of the Ukrainian president’s office, Aleksey Arestovich.
In other words, they are capable of acting against air targets, against other drones.
Even against piloted aircraft.
They will have Ukrainian engines and the rest of the Turkish avionics: the body, and so on," Dialog.ua quotes him as saying.
Commenting on the main features of the ANKA vehicles, Arestovich explained that they are jet-powered, not piston-powered UAVs.
According to him, this is a new generation of drones after the Bayraktar, which surpasses it "in all characteristics".
The first batch of drones should be produced by the plant at the end of next year, concluded Arestovich.
The ANKA unmanned aerial vehicle was created by the Turkish Space Agency in February 2014.
The drone was developed by the Turkish authorities in collaboration with a number of private companies since 2010.
The day before, the General Staff of the Armed Forces of Ukraine classified information about the use of Bayraktar drones and Javelin missile systems during the military operations of the United Forces in Donbass.
On December 6, the president of Ukraine, Volodymyr Zelensky, announced that the construction of a factory for the manufacture of modern military drones had begun in the country.
According to him, Ukraine intends to use drones.
On September 29, the Bayraktar Savunma company and the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense signed an agreement to build a center in the Kyiv region, where personnel will be trained, as well as tests and maintenance of the Turkish Bayraktar UAVs.
The press service of the Ukrainian leader's office called this memorandum "a big real step forward".
Two lions escaped from a container at the airport
Lions have escaped at Singapore's Changi Airport.
This was reported by The Straits Times.
Two predators managed to escape from the container with seven lions, which arrived on one of the planes.
The publication notes that it remains unknown from which country they were brought to Singapore, and where they were headed.
One of the escaped lions lay down on the roof of a shipping container.
The animals could not get away from it due to the protective net installed nearby.
The standoff ended after staff from the Mandai Wildlife Group, which manages all of Singapore's zoos, arrived at the airport.
They immobilized the lions with tranquilizer darts and plan to transport them to a quarantine facility.
Earlier, it was reported that in Phnom Penh, the capital of Cambodia, a lion escaped from its owner and roamed the streets of the city.
On the same day, the animal voluntarily returned home, and no people were harmed.
Experts warn of cancer threat from vitamin B9
Research suggests an excess of vitamin B9, also known as folic acid, can lead to cancer.
This was warned by the Daily Express publication.
According to the experts, there is strong evidence that people who are not deficient in folic acid are less likely to develop certain types of cancer, in particular, colorectal cancer.
However, exceeding the necessary dose, on the contrary, promotes the growth of cancer cells.
Professor Beth Kitchin, a dietitian at the University of Alabama at Birmingham, advises tracking the amount of folic acid consumed throughout the day.
The optimal dose is 400 micrograms per day.
The risk of cancer is only increased if you significantly deviate from this number in either direction.
Kitchin recommends not taking B9 in tablet form without a doctor's recommendation, and to be careful with dosage and avoid cereals with milk and other foods that contain folic acid.
Earlier, nutrition consultant Rachel Fine called folic acid a substance that slows aging.
Since it is found, among other things, in avocados, Fine recommended that men over the age of 50 eat the fruit more often.
In the UK, up to 75,000 people could die by April due to the omicron variant
British scientists’ predictions show that up to 75,000 people may die in England in the next five months due to the spread of the omicron strain of the coronavirus if restrictions are not tightened during the winter.
This was reported by the newspaper The Guardian, citing a study by experts from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM), according to TASS.
According to the most optimistic forecast of experts who are members of the Scientific Advisory Group for Emergencies at the British Cabinet Office, by April 2022, at least 25,000 deaths from the omicron strain will be recorded in the country, and about 175,000 patients will be hospitalized.
Meanwhile, at the peak of the epidemic, hospitals will be receiving more than 2,000 infected people a day.
'Serious coronavirus control measures may be needed to avoid overwhelming the National Health Service if the Omicron variant is more transmissible than the Delta variant and existing vaccines cannot prevent infections,' said mathematician Rosanna Barnard from LSHTM.
Earlier, the UK Health Security Agency reported that if the rate of spread of the omicron strain remains at its current level, about 1 million cases of infection will be detected in the country by the end of the year.
At the same time, by mid-December, the omicron variant could become dominant in the United Kingdom.
There are currently 1,898 cases of the Omicron variant of coronavirus in the UK, of which 633 were identified in the last 24 hours.
Moreover, on December 9, the head of the British Ministry of Health, Sajid Javid, indicated that in reality this figure could already be as high as 10,000 cases.
I wanted to write a smart comment, but I read up to this place:
"A fur coat, received as a result of the incredible suffering of an unfortunate animal and its employment at a second job."
And it fell under the table!
It turns out that "the poor animal" is the husband, and I thought it was a chinchilla!
The last knight on this planet.
Judging by the dislikes, Richard Gray, you are not expressing your thoughts very accessibly to the majority.
What did you mean - that those who are on Instagram are either pretending or they really do everything, because they have no reason to pretend?
The SZ is like a clearance sale, everything that didn't sell at the time ends up here.
If you set a goal and dig hard enough, you can find something worthwhile among the junk.
You just need to be patient and clearly understand what you are looking for.
Demand for superyachts has grown worldwide by a quarter
Superyacht construction this year and orders for next year are breaking records around the world, despite calls to reduce the carbon footprint and fight climate change.
The World Register of Ships lists 1,200 ordered yachts, a quarter more than last year.
In the era of tackling climate change, it is hard to imagine that the number of people who have the desire and the money for a £50m-plus floating fortress will not decline, The Guardian writes.
However, there are more and more of them.
This year, 25% more ships have been ordered than in the previous year.
Brokers say it's been 20 years since they've seen such a frenzy in the market.
The first reason is that many of those who can afford a yacht are fearful of contracting the virus on land and prefer to shelter from the pandemic on board their own vessel.
The second reason is also related to the coronavirus.
If before all these people went to the office and met business partners in person, now the vast majority of them work remotely, and negotiations are held via Zoom.
Broker Will Christie told the paper that shipyards are taking orders for new yachts for 2025 and beyond.
This means that owners are willing to pay more just to have their yacht delivered a year or two earlier.
"People just wanted freedom and the super-rich could afford it," he says.
In Western society, many criticize the behavior of the rich and call it decadent.
The rich, the sociologists say, don't want to understand that in times of austerity, space travel, life on yachts or flights on private jets cause resentment in society, because the elite does not want to share the responsibility for climate change with the rest of humanity.
Economists are calling on governments to act, proposing new taxes and rules on the super-rich, although they acknowledge that with money so mobile it will be extremely difficult to implement.
Meanwhile, it is only the number of ordered superyachts that is impressive, but also their characteristics.
Of the 1,200 ships, 27 have a stern length of more than 100 meters.
The Norwegian billionaire Rekke is building the REV Ocean yacht, which is 183 meters long.
When it is launched, it will be the largest yacht in the world.
The yacht features a "moon pool" as well as a submarine designed to explore the depths of the sea.
Helipads, open-air cinemas and, on some, such as McGregor's yacht, a mixed-martial-arts platform have become commonplace on existing superyachts. Professor of economic anthropology at Indiana University, Richard Wilk, says that compared with the total amount of greenhouse gas emissions, the carbon footprint produced by the super-rich is negligible.
But it has symbolic meaning, given that there are just over 2,000 billionaires in the world.
It's just another example of over-consumption by a very small group of people.
Scientists have found that the carbon footprint of billionaires is thousands of times greater than that of the average person on the planet.
If one person produces an average of 5 tonnes of CO2 a year, the world’s biggest polluter, Roman Abramovich, is responsible for 33.9 tonnes of greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere in 2018 alone.
At the same time, two-thirds of the carbon footprint came from his 162.5-meter yacht, Eclipse.
Even if the owner is not on the boat, the crew continues to pollute the planet.
The owner can call the captain and tell him to bring the yacht, for example, from the Mediterranean to the Caribbean.
Super-yacht owners do not elicit much sympathy when, like Australia's richest woman, Gina Rinehart, who owns mines on the continent, they complain on YouTube that there is nowhere to dock their giant ships.
It is also difficult to understand her call to build marinas for ships up to 50 metres in length.
Dangerous weekly alcohol dose linked to bowel cancer risk identified
American scientists have determined the amount of alcoholic beverages per week that increases the risk of developing cancer.
This is reported by the Daily Express.
The experts came to the conclusion that the consumption of four or more portions of alcoholic beverages per week is associated with an increased risk of developing cancer.
At the same time, the risk of developing the disease increases with the amount of alcohol consumed.
Moreover, men who drink moderately have a higher risk of developing bowel cancer than women.
Scientists cannot determine the exact cause of the development of this type of cancer, noting only that certain factors lead to a harmful process for the body.
Thanks to the author for the worthy material and photos.
Sergey, I see nothing wrong with egoism and pride.
Just as you do not see the selfishness and pride in the man who is looking for a free surrogate mother in order to dump the costs and responsibilities on her and enjoy the status of a father from a safe distance.
Why are they working in the ministry, they should be in the circus.
I understand that everything should have been on a royal scale, but the model is very exaggerated.
It's hard to imagine how poor Diana was crammed into a carriage, and in general any movement.
I was 12 years old and I remember watching the ceremony on TV.
It seems that almost all girls dream of being princesses in beautiful voluminous dresses, and I'm no exception.
But looking at such a dress, I changed my mind about being a princess.
Dogs can understand words and phrases at the level of a two-year-old
Many, and more specifically all, dog lovers are convinced that these creatures are very smart.
But even they have no idea just how sophisticated these four-legged pets really are.
For many years, biologists have conducted various experiments to find out for sure how intelligent animals are.
While a dog's vocabulary is not as extensive as a human's, a new study proves that a dog can respond to 89 words or phrases in sequence.
The scientists' work was published in Sciencealert.
Dogs can't play chess or write poetry, they don't understand politics, economics or art, but they often manage to fool their owners.
Representatives of some breeds show the best results in understanding human language, say experts, but there is not enough statistical data for accurate conclusions.
For example, some breeds are traditionally considered to be canine geniuses - for example, Labradors.
Scientists have come to the conclusion that dogs are capable of logical thinking, and their ability to learn is not inferior to that of a two-year-old child.
Dreamline Dream Massage TFK 80x200 mattress.
Mattress on TFK independent spring block with natural latex and coconut coir.
This mattress is made from the TFK independent block.
This is a reliable, modern design with 512 independent springs per sleeping place.
Each spring is in a separate pocket and has no influence on its neighbors.
Thus, the load on the mattress is distributed as evenly as possible.
People take on their natural shape while sleeping.
The springs are insulated from the top layers by a layer of thermal foil for strength.
The felt is topped with layers of natural latex and coir, which have excellent and wonderful properties.
One side is topped with a thin layer of natural seven-zone latex.
This natural filler has 7 comfort zones, promotes the perception of a person’s weight, and has a light massaging effect.
The Antistress cover is made of velvet, quilted with 250 g of hollowfibre per square metre.
It feels and looks nice, it has calming and relaxing properties.
A prime example is the deep-sea anglerfish Tautomaichthys Axel.
Some of its victims are so great that they cause the death of the diver.
It can't simply swallow them, and its teeth prevent it from spitting out too much prey back into the water.
If you don't care about the fate of your four properties, why did you decide that your properties are of interest to someone and that he will take care of them?
Today, the law does allow you to manage your property.
Do it yourself, if you don't like how others do it.
Ukraine is ready for a trade war between the US and Russia
The United States and Russia will “bargain” over Ukraine’s accession to NATO, analyst Alexander Kochetkov wrote in his article for the Glavred publication.
According to him, Washington and Moscow plan to continue negotiations in the near future about US guarantees that Ukraine will not join the North Atlantic Alliance, despite the words of American leader Joe Biden about the right of countries "to join anywhere".
If you are offered something obviously unacceptable, for example, to sell a close relative into sexual slavery, you would not haggle, but simply send the offerer away.
And as for Ukraine, a bargain is in the works," the analyst wrote.
Kochetkov added that Russia has no plans to attack Ukraine and is seeking dialogue with Kiev.
“The preparations are carried out secretly, quickly, and they immediately go on the offensive, and don’t wait for the group to be discovered and for countermeasures to be put in place”, he noted.
China is boosting the development of the railway industry
Advanced Chinese technologies have attracted the attention of companies from the United States, Germany, France and other countries at the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Exhibition held in Zhuzhou, Hunan Province/Central China/.
The main technologies developed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co. Ltd. allow the trains to automatically identify and diagnose technical faults, noted company representative Hou Zhaowei.
The high-speed trains running on the China-Laos Railway, which was put into operation at the beginning of this month, are already equipped with these technologies, ensuring higher reliability and operability of the rolling stock.
Over the past six months, China has significantly increased the export of railway transportation vehicles, and many countries in Asia and Europe are witnessing the "Chinese speed".
In May this year, the first two-storey high-speed electric multiple units developed in China rolled off the production line of CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd, which are intended for export to Europe.
With a maximum operating speed of 200 kilometres per hour, these trains will run on the railways of Austria, Germany, Hungary and other European countries.
In November, trial operation of a metro train developed by the above-mentioned company for Turkey began.
The train will travel along the metro line connecting the centre of Istanbul with the city's airport.
The metro line will open next year.
This will be the fastest metro line in Turkey with a speed of 120 kilometers per hour.
"The Chinese railway equipment manufacturing industry is one of the most innovative industries with the strongest international innovation competitiveness," said Feng Yaxiong, head of the Department of Trade and Investment of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade (CCPIT).
“This industry is the main competitive advantage of Chinese production of high-end equipment on the global market,” said Feng Yaoyuan.
After more than 60 years of hard work, China has created an advanced railway equipment manufacturing system with a full range of supporting facilities and large-scale production.
According to Fan Yaoshan, the country ranks first in the level of electrification of railways and in the operational mileage of high-speed railways and urban railways.
Biologist lists early signs of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semyon Golosheykin, speaking to Sputnik radio, listed the early signs of dementia.
According to him, the signs of future dementia can be forgetfulness, as well as a whole range of mild cognitive impairments, such as the inability to concentrate, plan, and reduce the level of abstract thinking.
It is currently being discussed that hearing loss can be both an early sign of Alzheimer's disease and one of the risk factors for its development, the specialist said.
Golosheykin emphasized that the causes of dementia can be neurodegenerative diseases, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
He added that Alzheimer's disease and atherosclerosis of the brain's blood vessels are the most common causes of this syndrome.
The biologist noted that today doctors do not know effective ways to treat dementia.
Therefore, it is necessary to start its prevention in a timely manner.
According to him, studying foreign languages and active communication will help reduce the risk of developing dementia.
The WHO also recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical activity, regularly exercising cognitive skills with games and hobbies that require intensive engagement of memory and logical thinking
"There are recommendations for the use of various dietary supplements, but their effectiveness and appropriateness are still being discussed in the scientific community," Golosheykin said.
"The World Health Organization recommends maintaining a moderate level of physical exercise, regular training of cognitive skills and abilities with the help of games and hobbies that require intensive involvement of memory and logical thinking," said Golosheikin.
Earlier this year, Alzheimer's Research UK said the disease was increasingly affecting people in their 40s.
Doctors have named the early symptoms of Alzheimer's disease.
The first warning sign can be problems with vision, due to which the patient acquires difficulties in recognizing objects.
Another sign of developing dementia is aphasia, a condition where a person is unable to find the right words to convey what they want to say.
A neurologist has demanded to send Saakashvili abroad for treatment
The former President of Georgia, Mikheil Saakashvili, needs psychoneurological treatment and rehabilitation abroad, the neurologist Otar Toidze, who is a member of the group of doctors created by the Ombudsman of Georgia, told journalists.
His [Saakashvili's] neurological status is leading in his illness.
The stable problems are problems with movement, coordination, and mood swings," the specialist said, noting that this does not go beyond the norm and now the former president needs to be sent for special rehabilitation.
"This is what we call neurorehabilitation and psychoneurorehabilitation, the possibility of which we did not find in Georgia," Toidze noted, demanding that Saakashvili be treated in a special institution, which does not exist in Georgia.
On the evening of December 7, Saakashvili began sabotaging the receipt of medical care after penitentiary service officers punished him with a disciplinary penalty.
The Georgian politician quickly managed to reverse the punishment and restore his previous rights.
Alexandra, "Do you even get paid for this?" - I wonder where people like this come from...
It’s normal to pay for bread in a bakery, but not for the work of a tutor?
Or are we so holy that we eat prana?
There's another side to this, though.
These people are parasites on the body of society.
They don’t work, they don’t pay taxes, they live on benefits and at the expense of their relatives.
At the same time, they receive complete medical care.
How many mouths can a job feed?
We are feeding all the alcoholics and drug addicts, who have also lost their health due to their own stupidity.
Then we are surprised by the extension of the retirement age.
This money could be spent on treating people who are actually ill.
Of course, the red victory flag will forever remain in the history of our country, and it must not be confused with the state flag.
The red flag has a reverse side and is a symbol of the communist movement, so it can never again be a state flag.
The author should stop writing provocative articles. It is time for the reds to calm down and start living a normal life, not living in the past.
Protests against COVID passports held in Spain
Protests against mandatory COVID-19 vaccination certificates took place in the Spanish cities of Barcelona and Valencia, reports the Europa Press agency.
In the Catalan capital, the number of participants reached approximately 3,000 people.
In Barcelona, COVID passports have become mandatory to enter bars, restaurants, gyms, nursing homes and nightclubs.
Many of the protesters came to the rally without masks.
Using slogans on their posters, they accused the state of totalitarianism and called for respect for the choice of citizens.
In Valencia, vaccination passports will also be required to enter entertainment venues and restaurants with more than 50 people.
Protesters in the city said it was medical dictatorship and called the vaccination an experiment.
In Spain, more than 5.2 million cases of coronavirus infection have been identified since the start of the pandemic, and more than 88,000 patients have died.
Russia is also planning to introduce restrictions for the unvaccinated.
The government submitted bills on a unified QR code system to the State Duma on November 12.
It is assumed that Russians will be able to visit mass events, cultural institutions, food and retail establishments with either a vaccination or prior infection certificate, or a medical exemption from vaccination.
The same rules will apply to travel on trains and airplanes.
The Tradition Anthracite 26cm cast iron brazier with glass lid.
A cast iron grill with an Antracite TM Tradition non-stick coating.
The items are designed for everyday use in the home.
The exceptional strength and durability of the non-stick coating, equivalent in resistance to natural stone, is specially designed for intensive everyday use.
A thick-walled cast case.
Five-layer non-stick coating of the latest generation.
A premium coating enhanced with mineral particles.
Two layers of extra protection against scorching.
It has good non-stick properties for easy and pleasant preparation of healthy dishes without oil and fat.
No less than 4000 cooking cycles, if used properly.
Suitable for all types of hobs except induction.
GOST R 51162-2019.
The warranty on each product is 4 years (provided that the operating rules are observed: 4 years for the body and 1 year for the non-stick coating).
Do not contain PFOA, LEAD, CADMIUM.
Pots and pans can be used in the oven without a glass lid.
Easy to clean.
The virus, by its nature, is constantly changing.
If a person is healthy and rarely gets sick (a cold once or twice a year), then their immune system is normal.
Immunomodulators are generally not recommended by doctors for prevention.
The immune system is supported by a healthy diet and routine, plus exercise.
Based on this, vaccination against the flu and this COVID is pointless.
3M 5925 anti-aerosol filter.
FFP2 protection level, 2 pcs.
Part No. 713946.
The FFP2 replacement filter for 3M 6000, 3M 7500 half masks and 3M full face masks.
It provides protection to the user's respiratory system from various substances in the air.
Creates a reliable barrier for infectious particles.
This filter is designed for use in conditions where the concentration of harmful substances in the surrounding air exceeds the permissible value.
The filter can be used to protect against bacteria/viruses along with, for example, essential oils and other antibacterials.
The FFP2 protection class has an APF greater than 0.05 mg/m3, with a maximum contaminant concentration of 12 times the APF.
Respirators of this protection class are capable of retaining at least 94% of harmful substances.
The pre-filters attach to the gas mask filters using the 3M 501 holder.
Characteristics: low resistance to breathing.
It doesn't obstruct the view.
Compatible with 3M 6000 and 3M 7500 half masks as well as 3M full face masks.
It is compatible with other PPE required in complex working conditions.
The "constitutional monarch's" bulging eyes, according to the network, didn't just bother me.
And this family PR - children, father...
Revva didn't seem to me to be anything special.
All he knew was to bother Zaitsev - Batrukha and Batrukha.
Well, I found out, I said it once, and be quiet, let your friend show himself, that's why we fought.
A steep climb: how the Chinese are becoming skiers
The Olympics should attract millions of people to the slopes and help create world-class resorts in the country
China is hoping that the Olympics will not only attract 300 million citizens to participate in winter sports, which will allow the collection of the 1 trillion yuan indicated by President Xi Jinping, but will also contribute to the economic development of the backward and remote provinces.
The Taibai ski resort in Zhangjiakou, located not far from the site of the 2022 Winter Olympic Games, is becoming more and more popular with Chinese people.
In addition to infrastructure construction in the region, landscaping work is also underway: workers are planting trees.
The country has more than 700 ski resorts, but only 20 of them are large enough to host international level competitions.
There are problems with snow in many regions of China where the resorts are located, including Zhangjiakou.
The main task for the long term is to ensure a comfortable and interesting vacation at Chinese resorts, so that all newcomers become regulars.
However, it's still a long way off.
Organizing committee adviser Justin Downes says China's ski industry has changed beyond recognition since his last visit in 2007.
Each year, more and more Chinese are going to the slopes in the winter.
Fiona, a snowboarder from Beijing, is one of them.
Despite the major changes, it will take many more years to build a ski culture here, says Downs.
Many resorts are located in agricultural and mining areas.
These regions still need to be actively developed and the necessary infrastructure for rest created there.
70-year-old Gao Macong lives in Chunli, not far from the Winter Olympic venues.
He notes that in recent years there has been a boom in winter sports tourism here.
Two years ago, a high-speed railway was laid from Beijing to Chunli, and now none of the locals are suffering from unemployment.
The country is seeing more and more shops open that sell clothing and equipment for winter sports.
Restaurants with national dishes are opening on the slopes.
Taiwan now even has a COVID-19 testing station.
China is looking to create a thriving winter sports industry, with its athletes becoming leaders in major international competitions and its resorts and equipment reaching world-class levels.
More than 500 million people could fall into extreme poverty due to the pandemic, WHO says
More than 500 million people worldwide could be pushed into extreme poverty as a result of the coronavirus pandemic, which has stalled global progress towards universal health coverage, the World Health Organization (WHO) and World Bank (WB) said.
To mark the International Day of Universal Health Coverage on 12 December, WHO and the World Bank published two complementary reports.
In them, they noted that the pandemic had caused disruptions in the provision of health services and caused excessive strain on health care systems.
In this regard, for the first time in 10 years, the population’s coverage with immunization has decreased, the number of deaths from tuberculosis and malaria has increased.
WHO and the World Bank emphasized that the pandemic has caused "the worst economic crisis since the 1930s, making it harder for people to pay for care."
The situation is pushing more than 500 million people "into extreme poverty because they have to pay for these services out of their own pocket."
In October, UN Secretary-General Antonio Guterres said the coronavirus pandemic has pushed more than 100 million people into poverty, and more than four billion people have little or no social protection.
Makita KP0810 Planer
An official Makita dealer.
The powerful motor is ideal for creasing.
Light weight and great balance.
Use of both standard and double-ended mini-blades.
A simple, quick-change blade system.
A new ergonomic body design, rubber inserts in the handle to reduce the effect of vibration on the user's hands.
Three V-grooves for different size chamfers.
The chip ejection system is selectable: left or right.
Wife, this is the meat of a fur seal.
It's a terrible disgrace.
Flying foxes have already had their fill of pangolins, and now they're onto jellyfish.
Oh, how many wonderful discoveries can still be prepared by moles, mantids, lemmings.
Reuters: Taiwan minister cut from broadcast at 'Summit for Democracy' at White House request
Taiwan's Minister of Digital Affairs Audrey Tang's appearance at a panel discussion during the U.S.-hosted "Summit for Democracy" was muted, according to a recording of the summit on YouTube.
Reuters, citing sources, says the image was taken down at the request of the White House.
According to their report, the reason was a map on which Taiwan was highlighted in a different color from the People's Republic of China, which considers the island to be its territory.
The map Ms Tan showed was produced by the South African non-governmental organization CIVICUS and ranked countries in the world according to the extent of civil liberties.
Taiwan was marked green on it as "free," while China, North Korea, Laos and Vietnam were marked red as "closed."
After the minister showed the map, the image from her side was replaced by a screenshot with a note that the opinions of the discussion participants "do not necessarily reflect the position of the US government".
China was not invited to the "Summit for Democracy."
Reuters sources note that the map shown by the Taiwanese minister could contradict Washington's "one China" policy.
One of the agency's sources said that after the map was shown, the US National Security Council angrily contacted the State Department, accusing it of showing Taiwan as a separate country.
The Washington-organized "Summit for Democracy" was held from 9 to 10 December with the participation of representatives from 110 countries and territories, as well as civil society organizations and charitable organizations.
Russia was not invited to the summit.
On the first day of the summit, the Nobel Peace Prize laureate and editor-in-chief of Novaya Gazeta, Dmitry Muratov, called for the creation of an international fund, through which money obtained through corruption would be given to charity.
Earlier today, Deputy Secretary of the Russian Security Council, Yuri Averianov, stated that the summit carried an “anti-Russian and anti-Chinese charge”.
They feed you the information that they are preparing food, and there is rotten meat everywhere; in fact, the butcher keeps the meat until the very last piece.
The classic of journalism is to create news out of nothing.
They boil the horns and hooves, getting a substance like glue.
The finished product looks like a yellow, semi-transparent strip that is almost odorless and hard like plastic, and is used as a natural gelatin.
In general, the amount of harmful substances from the processing of waste is no less than from its decomposition.
But this saves companies huge amounts of money.
This is why a fairy tale about the environment was invented for idiots who will also work for free to collect garbage for the idea.
Personally, my contribution to the environment is not to buy unnecessary things and to use things for a long time.
If I go beyond the limits, I don't throw it away, but give it to charity.
Football shorts Jogel Camp Jfs-1120-016, white/black (XL).
Description: Football shorts are great for playing football and sports.
The shorts have a straight, comfortable cut.
A wide belt, in combination with an adjustable drawstring, ensures a comfortable fit.
The fabric is highly durable, long-lasting, light, and has good air permeability, meeting the requirements of the game at any level.
The updated brand logo is on the left.
The shorts come packaged in a convenient reusable bag with a zip closure.
Stylish look, straight cut, wide belt with drawstring, strong, long-lasting fabric, good breathability.
Specifications.
Get into specialisations that allow you to work online.
Many of us get around the problem by working for an uncle, but abroad.
But because of the difference in currencies, it's advantageous for us.
Compared to other countries we are still poor.
Of course, you'll have to learn different types of work, but... working online allows you not to depend on the domestic labour market.
Our country hardly creates any jobs.
And the ones that are created - you can't really make money on them.
Egoist-Unity dinnerware set with gold plating (4 items).
The ‘Royal Childhood’ collection is one of the most extensive and well-known collections of children’s silver in Russia.
It includes many charming models of silver spoons, forks and knives, rattles and teething rings, baby bottles and cups.
All children's silver cutlery is subject to strict quality control.
Environmentally friendly silver, produced directly at the factory, and careful hand polishing with cotton rollers make the products absolutely safe for a child.
Thanks to the disinfecting function of silver, regular use of silver utensils can support the body's natural immunity and even prevent some of the common childhood diseases.
The factory’s specialists received a grant to apply a complex, but very beautiful guilloche technique, which was used by the famous Carl Faberge.
This allowed the creation of surprisingly bright and three-dimensional images on the products.
The collection is full of cute characters that will become a child's true friends.
Inca Squirrel, everything will be okay.
There's a second lung.
Lung tissue regenerates well if not all of it is removed, the remaining portion will expand.
If it is a pneumonectomy, however, the remaining lung will get larger over time and will function for two.
Try to breathe deeply yourself, fathers are stronger than daughters, they don't like tears.
Don't mourn too soon.
Smile and breathe, breathe...
New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made a suborbital flight
Blue Origin's New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made a suborbital flight on Saturday, December 11.
The journey, which was broadcast on the company’s website, lasted a total of more than ten minutes before the capsule with the passengers landed on Earth, reports TASS.
The launch of the launch vehicle was carried out from the spaceport in the area of the American city of Van Horn (Texas state).
The ship climbed to an altitude of just over 100 km, and the space tourists found themselves in a state of weightlessness.
The launch vehicle itself landed normally at the site of the cosmodrome.
The company Blue Origin successfully carried out the first suborbital flight of the New Shepard spacecraft with passengers on board on July 20.
SKETCHES OF A VILLAGE MOSCOWITE.
Don't lump them all together - bad people exist, and you may have a specific reason to complain about them...
but what does the number of children, age, pension fund and so on have to do with it?
They write that they are "scum, they didn’t return the money."
But how many and when to have children is not your business, as long as they don’t decide to hang these children around your neck.
And since this is ruled out, what right do you have to condemn them?
Perhaps this is only in education...
The chosen (by themselves) parents dictate their rules, openly disregarding the already existing ones.
And what if it applies to other areas of life, such as court proceedings?
For them, laws are not written.
And what if the father does implement his method of upbringing and education?
It is some kind of horror, and it is a very bad example for others.
Embroidery kit "Feathered stars" DESIGN WORKS 2719.
Contents of the set: Aida 14 ct dark blue canvas, stranded cotton, sequins, beads, needle, chart, instructions.
The Design Works production has its beginning in 1987 and to this day is popular all over the world.
Many of the motifs have been worked out by the well-known designer Ronald West.
Design Works cross-stitch kits come complete with quality Aida fabric, 100% cotton floss, and a size 24 tapestry needle.
You can also find kits for plastic canvas embroidery, Tobin embroidery is embroidery on napkins, tablecloths and more.
China has strengthened the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land ports of entry
The Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism of the State Council issued a circular to strengthen the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land ports of entry in order to further prevent the importation of the infection from abroad.
According to the circular, those leaving the designated cities must provide a negative result of a COVID-19 nucleic acid test obtained within 48 hours prior to departure.
Anyone traveling to cities with land ports of entry must take at least one COVID-19 nucleic acid test upon arrival.
The document says that these requirements will take effect from the date when the relevant provincial-level administrative units determine and publish the zones of these cities, until March 15, 2022.
In addition, it is noted that cities in which land border crossings are located and which meet certain conditions may consider the possibility of creating buffer zones for the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic within their jurisdiction.
Taisia Sokolova, as usual, is pulling Russian women towards the eastern ethnos through Indian films, which were only shown in Russian cinemas.
In the west, no one cared about this crap with the natives.
And how many cities and villages forgotten and abandoned?
Sontelle Spring Mattress Vivre Castom family, 140х195, part number: 5110704.
The layers of the RelaxFoam mattress, 2 cm: aloe latex 3 cm, coconut 2 cm TFK, coconut 2 cm, aloe latex 3 cm, RelaxFoam 2 cm.
The cover is a Splendid knit.
The knitted fabric, made from cotton, has a special design.
The base is wrapped with special synthetic threads, which ensure the special strength and softness of the material.
The cellular knit structure supports natural thermoregulation and moisture wicking during sleep and rest.
40% cotton, 60% polyester, weight 230 g/m2.
Dimaks OK Basis mattress, size 130x185.
The OK Basis spring orthopedic mattress is one of the most affordable models in the range.
The practical Balance Foam filler gives the mattress all the necessary orthopaedic properties, but at the same time keeps the price at a budget level.
This product is an optimal combination of price and quality.
The Balance Foam is a modern material that is made from PUR.
The filler is hypoallergenic and safe.
This is why foam is widely used in industry.
Its safety and reliability have been confirmed by a special certificate obtained in Europe, where such requirements are much more stringent than in Russia.
Another important quality of Balance Foam is its orthopaedic properties: the material supports the correct position of a person throughout the entire duration of sleep.
Thanks to the foam, the mattress has a below average level of firmness, so the product is considered to be quite soft by the manufacturer.
The main load-bearing block in the mattress is the SuperSprings.
It is notable for its independent springs, with 256 elements per square metre.
The practical block supports a weight of up to 100 kg per sleeping place, distributes the load and adapts the surface to the sleeper, reinforcing the orthopaedic qualities of the foam.
The manufacturer offers a choice between 12cm and 18cm high spring units at no extra cost.
Make sure to specify your preferences when placing an order with the store operator.
The mattress comes with a knitted cover, and together with it, the height of the model is 21 cm.
The case is non-removable.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress is CertiPUR certified.
The Arte Lamp A9566AP-1WG lamp from the Arte Lamp manufacturer.
It would be a great fit for rooms like the living room.
The main part of the lamp is made of metal.
The lighting fixture is available in the following colour(s): gold.
The lamp uses E14 light bulbs.
The total power allows to illuminate about 2 m2.
The manufacturer recommends this lamp for rooms decorated in the “Classic” style.
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs spoke about the “sad conclusion” in relations between Russia and the United States
Deputy head of the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Sergei Ryabkov, in an interview with Izvestia, assessed the prospects for the relationship between Moscow and Washington.
He noted that the long path of interaction has led to sad conclusions, and the problems between the two countries did not start yesterday.
There is a one-sided, negative predictability, but as for any prospects for improving relations, everything is completely unpredictable.
It's a sad conclusion after a long journey that we've been on with this administration and with Trump and with Obama.
Problems didn't start yesterday," the diplomat pointed out.
According to Ryabkov, the problem is related to the United States’ desire to impose its approaches to a number of issues on Russia.
The deputy head of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs added that he would not dare to make optimistic predictions about the prospects for improving relations and would not expect a change in Washington's position.
He explained that, with the exception of areas such as strategic stability and cybersecurity, no progress has been made.
At the same time, Russia calls on the United States to take a responsible approach to international security and hopes that the signals will be heard and the Americans will listen to the arguments of common sense.
Earlier, Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov stated at a meeting with US Secretary of State Anthony Blinken that Moscow was ready to restore dialogue with Washington.
Virologist warns of the danger of vaccination with a nasal COVID drug outside hospitals
Those who receive the nasal COVID-19 vaccine may experience an allergic reaction and require medical assistance, so the first vaccination points for this vaccine should not be established in airports and shopping centres.
TASS was told about this by virologist, corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, head of the Laboratory of Bionanotechnology, Microbiology and Virology at Novosibirsk State University, Sergey Netesov.
It is easier to set up vaccination points for the nasal vaccine in airports and shopping malls, but I would do it only in medical institutions at first.
The fact is that there is a possibility of an allergic reaction to such a vaccine, it is small, but it is desirable that the person sit next to the doctor’s office afterwards.
Doctors have special sets of anti-allergy drugs that work in a minute or two, which is sometimes very necessary", said Netesov.
According to the virologist, it will be possible to think about vaccinations in shopping centres when there is experience in using the drug.
He also stressed that when using the nasal vaccine, it is important that it reaches the mucous membrane in the nasal cavity.
However, there is a risk that the vaccine will not reach its destination if the person being vaccinated sneezes after the injection.
Paint-by-numbers on canvas, anime "Demon Slayer" 5426 40x60.
Want to feel like a real artist?
Coloring pages by numbers are interesting for both children and adults.
After all, many people love to draw, but sometimes lack the ability or skills.
This simple but very interesting activity allows you to relax, realize your creative potential and create masterpieces with your own hands.
There are many unusual pictures and “untrodden” topics!
We create topical stories on our own, and we try to ensure that the result pleases you!
It's all very simple!
When colouring in, the lines drawn on the canvas will not "run", they do not dissolve in water.
Each segment is numbered to prevent getting lost in the paint.
The finished picture will become a bright element of the décor, the cherry on the cake of the interior, attracting attention at first glance.
But this picture was not painted by just any artist.
You drew it yourself.
Do it with your own hands!
Serbia has produced 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine
The Sputnik V vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
Serbia produced about 2 million doses of the Russian Sputnik V vaccine, TASS quoted the country’s minister of innovation and technological development, Nenad Popovic, as saying.
“To date, approximately 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine have been produced at the Torlak state institute, and we expect at least 4 million to be produced in the coming period,” said Popovic.
According to him, the Russian vaccine is the most popular among the Serbs.
In connection with this, the republic is planning to make an additional purchase of a million doses of the vaccine from Russia.
The Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of Serbia has also expressed interest in the production of the nasal Sputnik V vaccine and Sputnik Light drug on the territory of the state.
Russian Prime Minister Mikhail Mishustin announced that Russia has delivered almost two million doses of its domestic COVID-19 vaccine “Sputnik V” to Serbia.
The lama says that true believers make up the church.
Whether these true believers exist or not, we cannot know.
Each of us would like to be such a true believer, and each of us tries to be.
But no one should say of themselves or of those who believe as he does that they are the only true believers.
Because if they can say of themselves that they are true believers, then so can others.
Benartti Prime Orto S1000 145x190 mattress.
The Prime Orto S1000 mattress has different levels of firmness, with an overall height of 22 cm.
The maximum allowable load per bed is up to 150 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per one sleeping place).
Each spring is in its own fabric pocket, allowing the springs to properly distribute the body's weight.
For additional protection, a layer of felt is added to the spring block, separating the mattress fillings from the springs.
On one side of the mattress is a 3 cm layer of coconut coir, which adds additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
On the opposite side of the mattress, a layer of 3 cm coconut coir and 1 cm of natural latex has been added.
Natural latex has an anatomical effect and wear-resistant properties.
The mattress cover is made of cotton jacquard, quilted with the eco-friendly Hollcon material.
The fabric has been treated with a special antibacterial coating from Sanitized (Sweden).
The impregnation ensures the complete destruction of mould, prevents the development of microorganisms, dust mites and bacteria.
The mattress is equipped with four convenient handles for turning it over, as well as ventilators for additional ventilation of the mattress layers.
The mattress is additionally reinforced around the perimeter with a frame of synthetic latex, which significantly increases its service life.
Alexander M., please remind me how the marathon went at the 2021 World Championships?
Can you see the cross-country ski track, along which the participants of the race must finish in classic style?
Attention, question - what is Klebo doing to the right of Bolshunov and how does he want to get onto the ski run if he was behind him at the turn before the start?
And the “best finisher” over 1.5 km and after 50 km are two different things.
It was a long time ago...
I was, and in fact, I wasn't even a driver.
He had the right, but he didn't know how to drive.
They offered to drive 250 km in one direction at MAZ!
He's young, he's bad, he agreed.
The owner is nearby, drinking vodka, and I'm driving.
First, as a king, he occupied the axis!
A column formed behind me.
I missed.
Then the belt on the power steering broke.
Then the traffic police stopped us.
They were in an organized column, and their vehicle broke down.
It needs to be towed.
The owner of the MAZ explained that he was drunk and the driver was inexperienced.
And to him - how drunk are you?
You don't trip, you don't fall.
In front of us with the flashing lights and forward!
In my opinion, he can't get away from advertising, and he has every right to feel sorry for himself.
Pevtsov is saying the same thing: about the return of the pension age.
For a long time, all the budgets have been drawn up taking into account the billions lost by the pre-pensioners.
Who is feeding them this nonsense?
In the UK, 1,239 cases of the omicron strain of the coronavirus were recorded in a day - RT in Russian
In one day, 1,239 cases of infection with the new omicron strain of coronavirus were identified in the United Kingdom.
This is reported by Sky News.
In particular, 1196 new cases of the “omicron” strain were recorded in England, 38 people fell ill with the new variant of the infection in Scotland, and five – in Northern Ireland.
The total number of people infected with COVID-19 from the new strain in the UK has reached 3,137.
Previously, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine, in a pessimistic forecast, calculated that 75,000 people could die in England by April as a result of the COVID-19 outbreak caused by the "omicron" strain.
Peskov warned of the suffering of western countries that are introducing anti-Russian sanctions
The press secretary of the President of Russia, Dmitry Peskov, commented on the possible introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in the event of continued “aggressive actions” against Ukraine, including because of the alleged “invasion” of the country’s territory.
“It’s impossible to impose restrictions on Russia and not suffer yourself”, the official representative of the Kremlin said on the air of the Russia 1 television channel.
Peskov claims that "everyone in the world understands this."
It was previously reported that the United States was considering the possibility of introducing anti-Russian sanctions in the energy sector as a last resort.
In addition, Washington and the European Union are planning to impose restrictions that will make it more difficult to convert rubles into dollars for Russian banks and the Russian Direct Investment Fund.
Meanwhile, the head of Sberbank, German Gref, is convinced that this is impossible.
From reasonable people, correspondingly reasonable comments!
Something about these simple-to-the-point-of-nausea recipes makes me want to vomit.
Apparently, the ideas have dried up.
Even in those distant times of childhood, my mother baked delicious pies and cakes, and it never occurred to me to compare a piece of bread spread with jam to a cake.
Ksenia, you don’t need to bring anything to my mind, my mind must figure it out on its own!
"The inability of the mind separated from the Spirit to perceive" - what are you talking about?!
Imagine that you need to explain this to a dim-witted child, how would you do it?!
(Remember that children up to 3-5 years old still have open channels of communication with the subtle world, and the child can know more than you!)
New Caledonia has rejected the idea of independence from France
According to the final results of the third referendum on the independence of New Caledonia, an overwhelming majority of participants refused to secede from France.
This was reported by the French television channel BFM.TV on December 12.
96.5% of those who voted were against independence.
3.51% of residents of the archipelago in the South Pacific supported independence from France.
2.99% of ballots were annulled.
Turnout on the day was very low, with around 55% of the archipelago's residents making it to the polls.
According to experts, the low turnout is due to separatist calls to boycott the referendum because of the coronavirus.
Paris refused to postpone the date of the referendum.
In October 2020, residents of New Caledonia voted against independence from France in a referendum.
In 2018, a referendum was already held in the region on the issue of independence.
Most residents supported the archipelago remaining part of France.
New Caledonia is nearly 20,000 kilometres from mainland France.
In 1853, France declared New Caledonia as its possession.
About 270,000 people live on the archipelago, and the territory is endowed with a special administrative-territorial status.
A 1998 agreement between Paris and the New Caledonian administration allows the region to hold a referendum on its independence every two years.
Boris, if you don’t know the story, don’t write.
The name of the city of Arsk comes from the Bulgaro-Tatar word "artysh" (juniper).
The Udmurts (ary in Tatar) live in the northern districts of the Baltasinsky and Kukmor districts.
The Udmurts are wonderful, hard-working people who have preserved their language, live in friendship with the Tatars, and know 3-4 languages.
Victor, I don’t know your age, but I want to tell you that the Motherland will never abandon you.
Fools will throw out “brave slogans”.
I say this to you with complete confidence, based on my life experience.
Don’t spit in the well; you may have to drink from it!
WHO preliminarily considers “omicron” to be less dangerous than “delta”
The World Health Organization (WHO) preliminarily believes that “omicron” is less dangerous than the delta strain of the coronavirus.
However, there is evidence of reduced vaccine effectiveness against the new variant of COVID-19.
According to information as of December 9, “omicron” has been registered in 63 countries.
"Preliminary data and the significantly changed antigenic profile of the protein of the "omicron" strain suggest a decrease in the effectiveness of the vaccine against infection and transmission of the variant.
According to preliminary findings from South Africa, it ("severity of disease" - rare) may be less severe than "delta"", the WHO said in a technical note.
The organisation notes that so far all registered cases of ‘omicron’ in the EU have been mild or asymptomatic.
At the same time, the new strain, according to preliminary data, spreads faster than “delta”.
Russia has registered two cases of infection with the Omicron strain.
They were "previously immunized," the Gamaleya Center reported.
The head of Rospotrebnadzor, Anna Popova, stated that there is currently no reliable data that the new variant of the coronavirus is less dangerous than the others.
In fact, lack of sunlight is very critical for us southerners.
During 10 days spent in St. Petersburg at some point in November, we saw the sun for the first time when our departing flight took off above the clouds.
It was then that I realised what I had always been missing in the wonderful city of Saint Petersburg.
Unforgettable jeep tours in the Caucasus:
To experience something that has never been experienced before - to drink the expanse with your eyes, mouth, and skin!
Those who see only water in the ocean,
The one on the ground doesn't see the mountains.
Your world of adventure +7 905 989 9172 What’s App
Siberian Expeditions - we are capable of spoiling even the worst mood!
Svetlana S., no, no, they don't give in.
If your beloved, with whom you intend to spend the rest of your life, does not agree to your requests, it means that he is a parasite who does not want to give back as much as he takes.
The problem with women is that they themselves are slowly shouldering everything.
And who is to blame here, if she herself took up the reins?
Four scenarios named for Zelensky in Ukraine
Former People’s Deputy of Ukraine Vadim Denisenko listed four possible scenarios for the development of events for Ukrainian President Volodymyr Zelensky in 2022.
In his opinion, the head of state may lose the support of the West, and he may also make compromises on Donbass.
Denisenko spoke about this on Sunday, 12 December, in a publication on the Glavred portal.
The first option, which Denisenko called the "ideal storm", assumes that key Western countries will stop supporting Ukraine, reaching an agreement on the country's future without its participation.
Such a development would set the stage for the deep crisis that Kyiv may face in 2023.
"Simultaneously, there is a decrease in prices for key goods that we traditionally export <...> internal protests and confrontation with the authorities by key FPGs (financial-industrial groups. - Ed.)", added the former parliamentarian.
According to Denisenko, there is another scenario for the development of the situation - "war against all".
This forecast will come true in case of high turbulence in world politics, when the Ukrainian authorities will face a number of problems.
Because of this situation, the leadership of Ukraine may compromise on Donbass, which may result in confrontation within the country.
At the end of the summer, Zelensky’s position will be weakened, and the likelihood of such a situation, according to the former People’s Deputy, is up to 50-55%.
The third option for the development of the situation in Ukrainian politics is a confrontation between groups of the population that disagree with Zelensky and the president, which could result in the seizure of control over the power block and the implementation of "populist initiatives".
In the course of such a variant of the crisis, Zelensky will begin “reformatting power”, added Denisenko.
Another scenario is the transformation of Zelensky into the “father of the nation”.
This can be triggered by some event that is a major shock to society.
"The event must be large enough to provoke a response from external partners and lead to an increase in support for Ukraine," Denisenko said.
Such a development of the situation is possible as a result of a natural disaster, a technogenic catastrophe or aggressive actions by Russia, the ex-deputy believes.
Moreover, the Russian side has already rejected any possibility of “attacking” Ukraine on more than one occasion.
In Moscow, they noted that it is the Ukrainian authorities, NATO and the United States that are increasing military activity near Russian borders.
Earlier, on 11 November, the survey results of the Rating sociological group showed that the rating of the Ukrainian president had fallen to a record low, amounting to 19.3%.
This is the worst figure since his election as head of state.
Analysts predicted a situation in which, in the event of the next presidential elections in Ukraine, only 21.8% would vote for Zelensky, while 14.5% would vote for the former president of the country, Petro Poroshenko.
At the same time, only 19.3% of those surveyed expressed support for the president.
KAISER Sena shower system (74182)
The KAISER Sena shower system (74182) is one of the best options in this category.
This brand is popular for its quality and durability, which is also confirmed by numerous customer reviews on third-party internet resources.
When you buy this product from us, you also get a guarantee from us on the quality and operability of the product.
We deliver by transport companies throughout Russia and to any region.
Should you find any defects, we will gladly refund the full amount you paid.
When you call the operator, you will be able to get a personal discount on this item.
Please leave a review after use.
Thanks to the author for the story about a great athlete; I didn’t know that Elena Shushunova had died, it is very upsetting to learn such things.
I remember how I supported her at the Olympics in Seoul; for us, residents of Primorsky Krai, it was a live broadcast, real time.
Such a passion, the emotions were off the charts, I remember the joy when Elena won.
We also celebrated all the other victories, just as we cheered for Salnikov, for the football players, for all the Soviet athletes at that time.
I once saw a documentary on TV about one of the Central American countries, and there they were rolling watermelons down the gangway onto the ship, like barrels.
The watermelons were the size of monsters.
I myself worked many times when I was young on the collection and loading of watermelons in Astrakhan region, and I never saw watermelons weighing more than a pud.
I buy watermelons weighing 4-5 kg straight from the garden and not earlier than the beginning of August.
Balconette bra with soft lace cups (size: 90E, colour: beige, composition: 90% polyamide, 10% elastane, article number: 12008).
Balconette bra with soft lace cups on frames.
The lower part of the cup is strengthened by a non-stretchy transparent panel.
The side of the inner cup, in the area of the strap attachment, is reinforced with non-elastic fabric in a fold, without additional seams for comfort.
It is this element that prevents the lace from stretching.
The richness of the lace can be appreciated thanks to the frill along the neckline and under the bust.
The vertical ribs on the side panels of the single-layer microfiber prevent the fabric from twisting on larger sizes.
I didn't like the article at all. It was mean and venomous.
Walked past people you don't know anything about.
But now many people like to break people down into atoms.
I hope that the commentators are honest and have integrity, and that they are experts in everything.
In Moscow in the evening, you think 100 times whether to go to the store alone, there are migrants everywhere, there are crowds of them.
They consider themselves to be the bosses.
And what about child benefits and pensions? Are you serious?
The benefits are paltry and are paid for a maximum of three years, the pensions are 12,000, someone wrote about dentistry, prosthetics have been paid for in Russia for a long time and are very expensive.
People are like from another planet.
Things are bad in France, but things are great here?
The Beautyson Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress has a compact texture, comfortable elasticity and firmness, wear-resistant and long-lasting properties.
The BeautySon product from the Sense series is designed for healthy sleep for people suffering from joint and vascular diseases.
The design ensures an even distribution of load over the surface and a pronounced comfort effect.
The base of the Beautyrest Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress is the S600 mini independent spring block with reduced spring height.
The company Beautyson uses spunbond, coconut coir, and polyurethane as internal fillers.
Spunbond serves as an intermediate insulating layer between the soft materials and the springs.
The orthopedic foam with carbon impregnation is shaped by contour cutting, which provides a micro-massage effect.
Coconut coir is a hypoallergenic material that gives the mattress high moisture-wicking and breathability properties.
The outer cover of the mattress is made of dense jacquard fabric with synthetic fibers.
The material is strong and durable, does not wear out and does not require special care.
The poet arrested for the action on Red Square: “They give 10 days for an Evtushenko quote, here’s the power of poetry!”
At the start of the week, 21-year-old poet Alexander Volchenkov was arrested for ten days.
An HSE student was detained on Red Square with a poster that had the hashtag #poetrossiibolshechempoet written on it.
This quote belongs to the writer Evgeny Evtushenko.
A protocol was drawn up against Alexander for a repeated violation of the procedure for conducting a public action.
He was detained for the first time on 23 January at Pushkin Square, at a rally in support of Alexei Navalny.
"The goal was to draw attention to poetry in general, now the interest in it, unfortunately, has been lost, to the decline of culture in general in Russia, and there is also a small hope to inspire unknown poets to write their poems on the Internet under this hashtag," Alexander explains.
We contacted the young poet to find out the circumstances of his arrest and to learn more about the message of his message.
How did the police officers treat you during the detention this time and previously?
What did the department ask, and how did they comment on your action?
This time, the employees were more polite, the detention was maximally polite, as it may sound funny in a certain context of this word.
On Pushkin, the OMON officers were taking people and they were taking them hard.
They asked the standard questions about motivation.
When they heard, in principle, they looked, if not approvingly, then understandingly.
With the exception of the wind-blown monkey enclosure, everything was top-notch, but I knew what I was getting into.
And if, after the action under this hashtag, a few people start writing their poems, I won't have spent those 10 days in vain.
Maxim, according to the protocol, talk to each other alone, even in the language of the Tumba-Yumba tribe.
And at public and official events, they speak in the language of the surroundings so that everyone understands what happened in the Bundestag on September 25, 2001, or in their native language via an interpreter.
This is a protocol and nothing more, by the way, Angela Merkel speaks Russian very well and yet uses an interpreter.
And at official events, minutes are taken the old-fashioned way with a pen, and the stenographer is not required to know several languages.
If you don't want to say much, just say no!
But there's so much water.
Well, to go as a tourist for six months “to the Andes, then to Nepal”.
Prior to this, convert all assets into liquid shares.
And gradually sell these shares, opening an account in any bank in the world.
Sell not in dollars, but in a currency less dependent on the United States, such as Swiss francs.
And then file for divorce from America.
However, this is not the only thing that keeps Americans in the U.S.
It bolsters their belief that the United States is better than anywhere else.
They are grown that way.
The Hansgrohe Quattro three-outlet mechanism (15930180).
Collection: Quattro; type: concealed installation mechanism; intended use: for a mixer, for a bath, for a shower; built-in systems: yes; installation type: built-in (in the wall); body material: brass; concealed installation mechanism: included; number of mounting holes: 1; country of brand origin: Germany; manufacturer item number: 15930180; barcode: 4011097345239.
Additional information: a pressure regulator is required; package contents: ceramic cartridge, sealing flange; 3 users; simultaneous operation of 2 users (showers) possible; suitable for all Quattro external units; water consumption: 65 l/min.
Researchers explain how potatoes help combat age-related disorders
The study found that potatoes are rich in vitamins and minerals that help improve circulation and lower cholesterol levels.
The root vegetable contains vitamins of group B, vitamin C, phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, riboflavin, folic acid, and pantothenic acid.
All of these elements help the body's systems to function.
In addition, potatoes help in the fight against age-related disorders.
Because of its high fibre content, it is beneficial for the gastrointestinal tract, and regular consumption may also help prevent hypertension and atherosclerosis.
However, for maximum benefit, the root vegetable is best stewed or cooked, rather than fried in oil.
The Daily Express previously warned that potatoes can be dangerous for diabetics, just like other foods with a high glycaemic index.
These are foods with carbohydrates that quickly break down into sugar, such as sugar, sweet soft drinks, white rice, and white bread.
At the beginning of December, Kommersant newspaper warned of a possible shortage of Russian table potatoes, noting a decline in its production in personal subsidiary plots and an increase in processing capacity.
According to market participants, the current shortage of products can only be met by imports.
Lostfilm, lordfilm and other pirates will be removed from Yandex search results
Relegation candidates
In 2015, the rights holders from the RAEC/Media cluster compiled a list of the 100 largest pirate sites on the Runet, and most of them ceased to exist, says Karen Kazaryan, CEO of the Institute for Internet Research.
However, Kinogo, Lostfilm and Filmix have managed to survive, in part, thanks to the regular change of domain names, he adds.
For example, on Lostfilm, which is available in the search results of both "Yandex" and Google, you can watch pirated copies of the Netflix series "Squid Game" and "Tenderness" by director Anna Melikyan - the original series of the largest video service in Russia, ivi (which is part of AIV).
On Kinogo, which is also available in search engine results, you can watch the animated new release "Encanto," but judging by the quality of the video, it's a so-called screener (pirated copy of the film taken in a movie theater).
The TNT series "Univer. 10 Years Later" (which is part of Gazprom Media) is available on Filmix, which can also be found via search engines.
Svetlana M., sorry, of course, but I would not give a damn if my son is offended for his mother or not.
If we have some kind of misunderstanding, it’s better not to get involved at all, just get out of the way.
Of course, it's good that this happens rarely.
Soft cup bra without underwires and front closure, coffee, 135I GI1265.
The T-shaped back is internally reinforced with crossed elastic ribbons of cotton and Lycra.
The bra is made from microfiber in combination with a mesh fabric for breathability.
Cups are lined with cotton-rich fabric for a comfortable fit.
Unique Magiclift design (crossing under the bust and along the décolletage) to lift, separate and support the bust.
The wide, comfortable, microfleece-lined straps are adjustable at the back.
Lyudmila, the most advanced space technology is now in China.
Russia is already hopelessly behind.
“This idea developed by the Poles” - it would be more accurate to say that Poland only adapted the idea of 1776 for itself, but developed it quite effectively.
In fact, the slogan “The suburbs are not Russia” appeared in 1848.
Which, in general, does not change the essence of the matter.
I watched her interview, the girl said that her biggest dream was to grow wings, her father is constantly pulling her down.
Well, it is all very doubtful.
Well, she got into the university, but what's next?
Maytoni MOD081WL-L13G3K Tessara wall lamp.
The wide circumference, framed by ‘molecules’ of light, provides the most even and bright lighting of the space.
"Atomic" or "molecular" design, reflecting the nature and natural essence of each object, is not losing its relevance and allows you to set accents in the interior to advantage.
One of the characteristic features of such lights is the weightlessness of the design.
The illusion of the chandelier floating in the air is created by thin, almost invisible wires that can be adjusted in height.
The metal gold armature and matte white miniature ceiling lights will easily complement any color scheme, and the chandelier and sconce presented in the collection will become a ready-made ensemble for lighting the living room, bedroom, or hallway.
Well, it’s a matter of taste and color, as they say.
I really liked Tarkhuna, not the current one, of course.
The freshly squeezed juices in tall glass cylinders were very tasty.
Three servings of syrup is too much, in my opinion.
Two was just right.
Dimaks Micro Ultimate mattress, size 160x190
Micro Ultimate orthopedic spring mattress.
The model is convenient because it has two different softness surfaces - high stiffness and a little more than average.
The product only contains high-quality and premium fillers, which have proven themselves to be only on the best side.
Springs: in the center of the model is a block of independent "micropack" springs.
This means that there are 2,000 coils for each sleeping place, which work completely independently of each other.
It is their functioning that gives the unique pinpoint adjustment.
"Micropack" is the highest-frequency of all the variety of Dimax spring blocks, so it has a pronounced orthopedic effect and is considered premium.
Fillers: above and below the springs are combinations of layers of coir and natural latex.
The only difference is the order of the tiles.
If one surface has latex, the other has coconut coir.
Such a tandem of fillings has long carried the status of a classic, since it gives the mattress not only orthopedic, but also anatomical properties.
If the coir provides proper back support, then the latex gives surface adaptation to the human body.
Cover: The model is supplied in a knitted Aloe Vera cover.
At the customer's request, it can be made both removable and stationary.
The total height of the product is 27 cm, and the recommended load on the sleeping surface is 170 kg.
Warranty and safety: the warranty period is 3 years.
The mattress has all the necessary certificates and documents confirming its full safety and reliability in use.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress is CertiPUR certified.
Estonian scientists to search for life on Venus
The Massachusetts Institute of Technology, in cooperation with the Tartu Observatory and other research institutions and companies, is preparing three space missions to Venus to search for signs of life in the atmosphere, reported Aktuaalne Kaamera on Sunday.
The goal of the five-year missions is to assess the habitability of Venus' clouds, and then look for life there.
For the project, the Tartu scientists proposed instruments to measure the acidity and oxygen content of Venus's clouds.
Up until now, it was thought that the clouds on Venus, the planet closest to Earth, were too acidic for life to exist, but Venus was probably an Earth-like planet to begin with.
During the third mission, a sample from Venus should arrive.
If we find life there, the main question will be whether it's similar to or different from life on Earth.
If it is very similar, it will be obvious that life on Earth did not begin on Earth.
If it is different, it is more likely that life began on Earth," said the head of the Estonian team of the Venus Life Finder project, Mihkel Pajusalu.
A hat, not a phone...
Six months for him, and all for the price...
This Chinese nonsense is getting on my nerves...
They can't make a quality phone...
My Samsung has already survived three of them (my friends have already thrown them away) and will survive even more!
Metaverses will change Russian business
The metaverse became a hot topic this fall, when Mark Zuckerberg announced that Facebook was changing its name to Meta.
For the market, this event was an important signal: the largest player has confirmed the development of a new format of digital interaction between people.
And this means that business in Russia, like everywhere else in the world, will invest in the creation of their own metaverses and their subsequent monetization.
Metaverses should be viewed as a continuation of objectively existing trends.
On the one hand, the trend of creating remote interactions in the conditions of the pandemic, because people are tired of separation and restrictions.
On the other hand, this is the result of businesses’ desire to develop ecosystems and to adapt their operational models to them.
The third - they are a logical continuation of the trend of digitalization of assets, when any rights, securities, works of art and even money are transferred to digital format.
Anna, you're right, changing your diet is a conscious process.
When you start eating properly, you no longer want anything too fatty or unhealthy.
Of course, we will have traditional Olivier salad and herring under a fur coat for the holiday, but no one is forcing me to eat everything at once.
You can eat it by the spoonful, try it - and that's enough.
After all, there really are ten days off ahead, so you can make any delicious and healthy dishes.
And how much hellish effort, time, and resources she put into her training.
And after performing 5 quadruple jumps, she was left without the gold.
And she also understands that four years before the next Olympics, she won't be able to handle it, i.e. she will never be an Olympic champion.
And to those who haven't just done sports or can't imagine all the hell she's been through, DON'T JUMP TO JUDGEMENT.
British economist failed to predict 2022
The British economist Jim O'Neill was unable to make a forecast for 2022, as, in his opinion, such attempts would end in failure.
He wrote about this in an article for Project Syndicate.
The expert believes that the next year will be full of unpredictability and any trend can change the turnover.
The most important factor remains the coronavirus pandemic, and the second most important factor is inflation, he believes.
O'Neill also admitted he did not know if price rises were temporary or not.
As the specialist pointed out, even before the pandemic, it was clear that "the world of the central bank's limitless generosity has run its course" and it was time to return to a relationship where interest rates, adjusted for inflation, would be correlated with expected GDP growth rates.
O'Neill noted that amid the pandemic, continuing ultra-accommodative economic policy could, according to some experts, lead to a new wave of inflation.
In addition, the issue of productivity growth, rising poverty and climate change should be noted, concluded O'Neill.
Earlier, the head of the global research department at Otkritie Investment Mikhail Shulgin said that positive expectations for the dollar rate in 2022 remain, but the potential for growth will be less significant.
Among the risks for the dollar, Shulgin named the monetary and credit policy of the Federal Reserve, the dynamics of oil prices, and fears in the wake of the coronavirus pandemic.
I'm forced to agree.
But one thing is pleasing: if you compare yourself with yourself, five years ago there were fewer containers.
Things are better now.
Progress is being made, but it is slow.
There is another problem: there are a lot of environmental initiatives in cities, but people don’t know about them.
All kinds of eco-taxis that collect waste from the home.
Yes, a simple recycling drop-off point is used by the dregs of society.
Few people put glass and metal in there.
Well, and the author...
Sausages with “cat” in them at Soviet factories?
"Low-end" chocolate in the USSR?
Well, yes, they are not as tasty as Doshirak, I understand...
And I would now wrap up some Soviet sweets with a white filling.
There are none left.
"Pilot" has not been released, and "Romashka" is not at all the same...
EVA car mats (rhombus) for Hyundai Tucson I (2004-2010).
EVA car floor mats are made of high-quality material produced in Russia.
The surface of the mats consists of cells in the shape of rhombs.
The thickness of the mats is 10 mm, and the depth of the cells is 5-6 mm.
The mats do not absorb or allow water to pass through.
All the dirt is evenly distributed in the compartments, keeping the surface clean.
The material from which the mats are made is elastic, wear-resistant and odourless.
It retains its properties in the temperature range from -50 to 50 °С.
The mats are easy to use and suitable for year-round use.
The EVA floor mats cover the factory carpet as much as possible, covering the rest area for the left foot.
The rear tunnel is covered by a mat.
The edging is made from a super-strong automotive strap.
Dimax Practic Base Plus V13 180x220 cm mattress
The Dimax (Dimax) Practic Basis Plus in13 springless mattress consists of a single type of filler.
It's a 13-cm-high sheet of artificial latex.
Due to the characteristics of the material, the mattress has a symmetrically medium-hardness on both sides.
The product is covered with a jacquard cover with a fastener on the comfort layer, with a choice of removable or non-removable type.
PU foam is a hygienic material with anatomical properties.
The main advantages of artificial latex (PUF) are characteristics similar to the natural analogue, but at a lower cost.
Synthetic latex is resilient and elastic, but, unlike the natural material, has greater stiffness.
It forms an anatomical surface of the mattress with high-quality support, ensuring a comfortable sleep.
The material is well ventilated, does not retain moisture and does not cause allergic reactions.
The strength of this filler ensures the durability and wear resistance of the mattress.
A quality mattress that is not afraid of temperature changes.
Anatomical, inexpensive and resistant to temperature changes, this mattress is ideal for arranging a sleeping place in a dacha or a country house.
Among its advantages are the universal medium hardness and maximum load of up to 100 kg, which makes this mattress suitable for most categories of users.
Russians handed over about 4.5% of the country's GDP to car dealers
According to the results of 10 months of 2021, Russians spent 2 trillion 784 billion rubles on the purchase of new cars, which is 28% more than for the same period last year, according to statistical data from the Russian Automotive Market Research (NAPI) agency.
For comparison, a similar amount (about 3 trillion roubles) was spent by the state to support citizens and the economy during the COVID-19 pandemic.
In September last year, at a meeting of the heads of states of the Shanghai Cooperation Organization, President Vladimir Putin said that such an amount is comparable to more than 4.5% of the country's gross domestic product (GDP) for 2020.
In terms of income, the Korean brand Kia leads the Russian market.
In the first 10 months of this year, he managed to sell cars worth 325.7 billion rubles, which is almost 24% more than a year earlier.
For the related Kia brand, Hyundai’s growth is even more significant - more than 35%, and the revenue from the sale of cars is estimated at 279.3 billion rubles.
The brand is in the leading position in terms of the increase in the average weighted price of the car - over the year, it has increased by almost 21% to 1.94 million roubles - the rate of price increases was only higher for Changan, Chery, Geely and Mercedes-Benz.
At the same time, the volume of sales for Korean brands did not grow as significantly: according to statistics from the Committee of Automobile Manufacturers of the Association of European Businesses in Russia, in quantitative terms, Kia sold 9.4% more cars during the same period as the previous year.
Hyundai - almost 12%.
Rounding out the top three leaders in terms of sales in monetary terms is the Japanese Toyota - Russians spent 275.5 billion roubles on cars of this brand in 10 months, which is 14% more than a year earlier.
The Japanese are followed by Mercedes-Benz with a figure of 266.1 billion rubles (+75%) - the German premium brand has increased both the volume of sales (by 37%) and the average price of a car (almost by 28%, up to 8.2 million rubles).
“Mercedes-Benz is simultaneously seeing a good increase in sales and average price – more, for example, than BMW – which is why there is also a greater increase in financial capacity”, explained NAPI CEO Tatyana Arabadjieva.
Chinese brands, which have also significantly increased their financial capacity this year, are demonstrating fantastic sales growth figures."
Russian Lada, in terms of income growth, is showing average market figures (plus 28%), and Russians spent 229.4 billion roubles on cars of this brand over 10 months.
Companies are at the same level as last year in terms of financial capacity, whose car sales in units fell in 2021: in particular, Volkswagen, Mitsubishi and Nissan.
UAZ is in the negative - over 10 months, Russians spent 12 billion roubles on off-road vehicles and pickups of this brand, compared to 12.4 billion roubles a year earlier.
Against the backdrop of problems with the supply of automotive components and disruptions in production, which have affected the entire global automotive industry, car companies continue to continuously adjust prices – AvtoVAZ has raised the price of Lada models seven times this year, the last price increase (by 8-10 thousand rubles) took place at the end of November.
Other car manufacturers also regularly change the price tags on their products.
The volume of the Russian car market in monetary terms will continue to grow - in addition to the shortage of cars, inflation, as well as the desire of car manufacturers to make up for past losses, are contributing to this, experts believe.
In the context of a shortage of cars, I think that many car manufacturers have even been able to pass on to the consumer some of the costs of previous periods that they were not able to include in the price of cars before,
says VTB Capital’s auto analyst Vladimir Bespalov.
I believe that car manufacturers are doing very well in terms of finance, maintaining high margins on sales".
An indirect indicator of this is the rate of growth in the cost of cars, which has been observed during 2021: new car prices are rising faster than inflation, the expert clarifies.
In the long term, the market will grow both in terms of quantity and in monetary terms, but mostly due to inflation and the increasing complexity of the machines themselves, predicts Bespalov.
As supply grows, opportunities to raise prices will be limited.
In monetary terms, the Russian car market will continue to grow in the coming year, even if the growth in the cost of cars slows, car manufacturers will be able to get their income from the volumes, notes independent automotive consultant Sergey Burgazlyev.
Given the high demand and limited supply, automakers are now trying to get the most profit out of each car sold, notes Burgazlyev.
It is not expected that there will be an increase in the production of cars at least for the next six months, and in Russia, the frenzy is further fueled by the uncertainty of citizens about the future.
Against the background of the situation in the market, cars turned out to be a good investment object - a car bought a year ago, even with a mileage, can now be sold for more than the initial price, notes the expert.
Biden commented on the deployment of U.S. troops to Ukraine in the event of a Russian invasion
The United States has never considered sending American troops to Ukraine in the event of a "Russian invasion".
U.S. President Joe Biden made such a statement.
"There has never been such a plan," said the head of the White House in response to a journalist's question about whether the US had abandoned such an idea.
Biden noted that in the event of an escalation of the situation around Ukraine Russia will face economic consequences.
At the same time, he emphasized that the United States and NATO have no obligation to use military force to protect Ukraine in the event of an escalation.
The American leader also stated that the possibility of unilateral use of American troops to defend Ukraine is not on the agenda.
Biden explained that if Russia invades Ukraine, the United States will deploy forces to NATO countries in Eastern Europe (Bulgaria, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Romania, Slovakia, the Czech Republic, and Estonia).
"We're going to have to move more American and NATO forces to the eastern flank, the B9 - all those NATO countries that we have a sacred commitment to defend them from any Russian aggression," Biden said.
Earlier, the press secretary of the President of Russia, Dmitry Peskov, emphasized that Moscow has no intention of invading the territory of Ukraine.
At the same time, he pointed out that Moscow sees the problem in the military use by Kiev of the drones delivered by Turkey, as well as in the fact that “American weapons are approaching our territory”.
I immediately leave such interviews.
If during the interview they already want to make me listen to screams, wait for hours, drink an incomprehensible brew and wash another cup - it's scary to imagine what will happen at work.
I will find a normal place for myself, without the HR layer, where you can talk directly with the head.
The Promtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 100x185 cm mattress
The average height Promtex-Orient Monolith Combi 16 springless mattress is created from alternating layers of natural latex and coconut coir.
One side is medium-firm and the other side is moderately firm.
The elegant white jacquard cover is filled with polyester and features a zipper around the perimeter.
Two types of filling.
The sandwich model consists of eight layers of fillings.
Between the layers of latex are thin sheets of coconut coir.
The layered structure of the mattress is distinguished by increased wear resistance, durability and resistance to loads.
Natural latex is a dense, elastic, and breathable material in terms of its characteristics.
The filler holds its shape and recovers quickly after stress.
Coconut coir increases the strength of the product and has natural antimicrobial properties.
The combination of these two materials allows the creation of a durable orthopedic sleeping place that will serve buyers for many years.
Versatility and orthopaedic support.
The mattress is suitable for people of different body types and ages.
The medium-firm surface is a balanced combination of orthopaedics and comfort.
The opposite side of the model is less comfortable for soft tissue, but has more pronounced orthopaedic properties.
A moderately firm sleeping surface is more relevant for those who need "relief" for the back and healthy posture.
The mattress is ideal for one person or a couple.
The latter will particularly appreciate the presence of a stable surface and the absence of the "wave" effect when the vibrations on one side of the mattress can be transmitted to the opposite side, disturbing sleep.
Desktop easel "Studio" 20*24*54(65) cm for canvas 40 cm.
"Studio" desk-top easel with height-adjustable upper holder.
Suitable for small-sized canvases.
The material is natural beech, varnished.
It will be convenient for both novice and professional artists.
Smooth adjustment of the tilt angle.
It is equipped with a support shelf for canvases and tablets.
The upper stretcher bar holds the canvas securely in place.
The maximum height of the easel is 65 cm, and the maximum size of the canvas is 40 cm.
If a fraudster calls from such a number, like a "police officer" or another law enforcement officer, then immediately hanging up is ineffective, and it is unlikely you will have time to add them to your blacklist.
Because to confirm his lie about being involved with the security services, he quickly repeats the challenge and continues to threaten and cajole.
The people need more useful recommendations.
That's just nonsense...
I really don't believe that it was like that.
They no longer know what to come up with and whom to accuse.
They got to the Queen.
And most importantly, in their opinion, everyone else is to blame, except for the very top...
Wouldn't it have been easier to leave people alone from coercion, of course, if our leaders were concerned about their people.
Perhaps all the virus strains will disappear...
As in Japan... before the elections, they weakened the influence, and the number of infections decreased...
The felting wool set "Assortment No. 2" is 100% merino wool, 4x10 g.
The craft of felting began eight thousand years ago, but it was very difficult to find animal wool for this kind of work, and coloured wool even more so.
But now, voila!
We offer semi-fine natural wool for felting from a Russian manufacturer, for which you do not have to run through the forest or pasture.
The unique properties of felting wool make it possible to create bright and unique items.
For example, you can make a cute toy for yourself or your little one, appliques for creativity, jewellery, interior decorations and even clothing and accessories.
Imagine a couple of "married" fluffy little sheep on your shelf, a small photo frame on the wall, a colourful necklace that will look great with your new dress, or unique home slippers that no one else will have...
Bring your ideas to life, "felting" this wonderful wool!
Maria Kartashova, what does “in response to this” mean?
As for me, I do not voice my thoughts, I mentally curse you all.
I mentally cut off the heads of all those who did not give way to me, mentally sent them into the gutter and burned all the cars that got in my way, mentally all of them!
And I can even smile at you.
But I remember that thought is material!
Peter, Nicholas II did not sign a single death sentence during his reign.
Even to the likes of Koba and his gang.
And bloody Sunday is already the invention of the Bolsheviks.
Comfort Line Hard Classic TFK 180x190 mattress.
The mattress is firm on both sides.
The natural material latex-coated coconut coir does not cause allergic reactions and adds the necessary stiffness and elasticity to the mattress.
The independent TFK spring block (512 springs per sleeping place) will provide unique comfort and correct spine support during sleep.
Cotton jacquard cover, 200 g wadding.
The hullcone provides protection and comfort.
The maximum load per bed is 130 kg.
My little horse.
Pony house with accessories, 6 in display.
The charming little pony lives in a cozy folding pink house.
If you open up her house, inside one of its halves you can set up a kitchen, and on the other half a table with treats for guests.
The pony has big, beautiful eyes, and its mane and tail can be brushed with a brush.
Included in the set are: a 9cm pony, a comb, a house (2 halves), a built-in table (2 parts), a kitchen (2 parts), accessories: scissors (2 parts), a heart-shaped cake (2 parts), a juice bottle, 2 glasses, a kettle, a cup and a saucer.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS 90х190х27 mattress weighs 27.9 kg.
The alternating layers of latex and firm coconut coir give the effect of enhanced body support.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS mattress has no problems supporting a load of up to 170 kg per sleeping place.
At the same time, there is no wave effect: the spouses lying next to each other do not roll towards each other, regardless of the difference in weight.
The materials used to make the model have passed a thorough quality control check.
They ventilate, do not become damp, and do not absorb odours.
Thanks to full air circulation, a unique microclimate is created, which is conducive to a healthy vacation.
A high-strength hot-melt adhesive was used to join the parts together.
A film by Alexander Sokurov's student won the European "Oscar" for best editing
The Oscar-nominated Russian film, ‘Unclenching the Fists’, has received an award from the European Film Academy (which is also called the ‘European Oscar’) in the ‘Best Editing’ category, reports ‘Komsomolskaya Pravda in Moscow’.
The competition's jury, which voted online due to the difficult epidemiological situation, assessed the outstanding skill of the film's creators.
The maximum number of awards this time went to the film by Jasmila Zbanic (Bosnia) "Where are you going, Aida?"
The main character of the film is a translator for the UN mission, who is trying to save her family during the war in Yugoslavia.
As for the film ‘Clenching Fists’, directed by Kira Kovalenko (a graduate of Alexander Sokurov’s workshop), this film tells the story of the difficult relationship between a powerful father and his children who are growing up and want to break free from their father’s authority in North Ossetia.
It was previously announced that the film has been nominated for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film.
As the regular friendly meetings of the presidents of Russia, Azerbaijan, and Turkey show, in my opinion, you, to put it mildly, are not in the know.
Only yesterday the president of Azerbaijan approved the opening of a joint Azerbaijani-Russian KAMAZ enterprise.
